Indiana, session 2026, HB1363.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-2-1-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.100-2012,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) There is hereby created the position of
executive director of the law enforcement training board.
(b) The executive director shall be selected by the board. The
executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the board. and the
executive director's tenure of office shall be protected by a four (4)
year, renewable contract of employment which may be terminated
earlier by the board only for inefficiency, incompetence, neglect of
duty, or other good cause after having been accorded a hearing by the
board upon reasonable notice of the charge being made against the
executive director. A vote of at least eleven (11) members of the board
shall be necessary for the early termination of said contract of
employment. The executive director shall be selected on the basis of
education, training, and experience, and shall have at least ten (10)
years experience as an active law enforcement officer, at least five (5)
years of which shall have been in an executive or administrative
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


capacity.
(c) The executive director shall:
(1) perform such duties as may be assigned by the board; and
(2) shall be the chief administrative officer of the law
enforcement academy.
(d) The salary and compensation for the executive director, the
training staff, and employees shall be fixed by the board with the
approval of the governor.
(e) The executive director shall establish a table of organization to
be supplemented with job descriptions for each position subordinate to
that of the executive director, all of which shall be subject to the
approval of the board.
(f) All persons individuals hired to fill such approved vacancies
shall be selected on the basis of qualifications and merit based on
training, education, and experience.
(g) Employees and members of the training staff shall not be subject
to discharge, demotion, or suspension because of political affiliation,
but may be discharged, demoted, or suspended only for cause after
charges preferred in writing by the executive director.
(h) Any person so discharged or disciplined employee shall have a
right to a hearing before the board if such person the employee
requests a hearing by giving notice to the executive director within
fifteen (15) days after receiving written notice of discharge or
disciplinary action.
(i) Procedures under this section shall be consistent with IC 4-21.5.
SECTION 2. IC 5-10-10-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.119-2022,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "public safety officer"
means any of the following:
(1) A state police officer.
(2) A county sheriff.
(3) A county police officer.
(4) A correctional officer. correctional professional, which
includes a correctional officer, a correctional police officer, or
any employee of the department of correction.
(5) An excise police officer.
(6) A county police reserve officer.
(7) A city or town police reserve officer.
(8) A conservation enforcement officer.
(9) A town marshal.
(10) A deputy town marshal.
(11) A probation officer.
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(12) A state educational institution police officer appointed under
IC 21-39-4.
(13) A police officer whose employer purchases coverage under
section 4.5 of this chapter.
(14) An emergency medical services provider (as defined in
IC 16-41-10-1) who is:
(A) employed by a political subdivision (as defined in
IC 36-1-2-13); and
(B) not eligible for a special death benefit under IC 36-8-6-20,
IC 36-8-7-26, IC 36-8-7.5-22, or IC 36-8-8-20.
(15) A firefighter who is employed by the fire department of a
state university.
(16) A firefighter whose employer purchases coverage under
section 4.5 of this chapter.
(17) A member of a consolidated law enforcement department
established under IC 36-3-1-5.1.
(18) A gaming agent of the Indiana gaming commission.
(19) A person who is:
(A) employed by a political subdivision (as defined in
IC 36-1-2-13); and
(B) appointed as a special deputy under IC 36-8-10-10.6.
(20) A school corporation police officer appointed under
IC 20-26-16.
(21) A gaming control officer of the Indiana gaming commission.
(22) An eligible chaplain who meets the requirements of section
4.7 of this chapter.
(23) A community corrections officer.
(24) An eligible emergency medical services provider who meets
the requirements of section 4.8 of this chapter.
(25) An emergency medical services provider whose employer
purchases coverage under section 4.9 of this chapter.
(26) An emergency management worker (as defined in
IC 10-14-3-3), including:
(A) an employee of the Indiana department of homeland
security who is working in an official capacity as an employee
during a disaster or an emergency response; or
(B) an employee of a political subdivision who is employed as:
(i) an emergency management director;
(ii) an assistant emergency management director; or
(iii) a deputy emergency management director;
for the political subdivision.
(27) A division fire investigator (as described in IC 22-14-2-8).
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(28) A school resource officer (as defined in IC 20-26-18.2-1)
who is not otherwise entitled to a line of duty benefit under:
(A) IC 36-8-6-20;
(B) IC 36-8-7.5-22; or
(C) IC 36-8-8-20;
while acting as a school resource officer.
(29) A county coroner.
(30) A deputy county coroner.
SECTION 3. IC 5-10-13-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.178-2022(ts),
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "employee" means an
individual who:
(1) is employed full time by the state or a political subdivision of
the state as:
(A) a member of a fire department (as defined in IC 36-8-1-8);
(B) an emergency medical services provider (as defined in
IC 16-41-10-1);
(C) a member of a police department (as defined in
IC 36-8-1-9);
(D) a correctional officer (as defined in IC 5-10-10-1.5);
correctional professional, which includes a correctional
officer (as defined in IC 5-10-10-1.5), a correctional police
officer, or any employee of the department of correction;
(E) a state police officer;
(F) a county police officer;
(G) a county sheriff;
(H) an excise police officer;
(I) a conservation enforcement officer;
(J) a town marshal;
(K) a deputy town marshal;
(L) a department of homeland security fire investigator;
(M) a member of a consolidated law enforcement department
established under IC 36-3-1-5.1;
(N) a county coroner; or
(O) a deputy county coroner;
(2) in the course of the individual's employment is at high risk for
occupational exposure to an exposure risk disease; and
(3) is not employed elsewhere in a similar capacity.
SECTION 4. IC 5-26-1-1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 1. As used in this article, "commission" refers to the
integrated public safety commission established under IC 5-26-2-1.
SECTION 5. IC 5-26-1-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. As used in this article, "department" means the
Indiana department of emergency communications established by
IC 5-26-2-1.
SECTION 6. IC 5-26-1-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. As used in this article, "fund"
refers to the integrated public safety emergency communications fund
established under by IC 5-26-4-1.
SECTION 7. IC 5-26-1-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 3. As used in IC 5-26-2, "member" refers to a member of
the integrated public safety commission.
SECTION 8. IC 5-26-1-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.66-2017,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. As used in this article, "user agency" means a
public safety agency or other entity that enters into an agreement with
the commission department to use the system.
SECTION 9. IC 5-26-2-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.66-2017,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The integrated public safety commission
Indiana department of emergency communications is established
for the purpose of promoting the efficient use of public safety agency
resources through improved coordination and cooperation to enhance
the safety of Indiana residents.
SECTION 10. IC 5-26-2-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The commission
department shall publish its policies within a standardized operations
procedures manual.
SECTION 11. IC 5-26-2-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 3. (a) The commission is comprised of twelve (12)
members as follows:
(1) A sheriff appointed by the governor.
(2) A chief of police appointed by the governor.
(3) A fire chief appointed by the governor.
(4) A head of an emergency medical services provider appointed
by the governor.
(5) A mayor appointed by the governor.
(6) A county commissioner appointed by the governor.
(7) A representative of campus law enforcement appointed by the
governor.
(8) A representative of the private sector appointed by the
governor.
(9) The superintendent of the state police department.
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(10) The special agent in charge of the Indiana office of the
Federal Bureau of Investigation or designee.
(11) An individual appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives.
(12) An individual appointed by the president pro tempore of the
senate.
(b) Not more than four (4) members appointed under subsection
(a)(1) through (a)(8) may be members of the same political party.
(c) The terms of the members appointed under subsection (a)(1)
through (a)(8) are four (4) years in length and expire as follows:
(1) For a member described in subsection (a)(1) through (a)(4),
December 31, 2025, and each fourth year thereafter.
(2) For a member described in subsection (a)(5) through (a)(8),
December 31, 2027, and each fourth year thereafter.
(d) A member appointed under subsection (a)(11) or (a)(12) serves
a term of two (2) years. The term expires June 30 of an odd-numbered
year.
(e) A member of the commission may be reappointed to successive
terms. A vacancy on the commission shall be filled by the appropriate
appointing authority. An individual appointed to fill a vacancy serves
for the unexpired term of the individual's predecessor.
SECTION 12. IC 5-26-2-4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 4. (a) Seven (7) members of the commission constitute a
quorum.
(b) An affirmative vote of at least seven (7) members of the
commission is required for the commission to take action.
SECTION 13. IC 5-26-2-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.136-2018,
SECTION 39, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. The commission's department's powers
include the following:
(1) Planning for voluntary coordination of resources by public
safety agencies.
(2) Developing coordinated, integrated responses to significant
public safety events by those public safety agencies that choose
to take part.
(3) Developing means of sharing information operationally and
technologically to improve public safety.
(4) Contracting with consultants to assist in the planning and
development under this article.
(5) Contracting with others to provide services under this article.
(6) Accepting gifts, devises, bequests, grants, loans,
appropriations, revenue sharing, other financing and assistance,
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


and any other aid from any source and agreeing to and complying
with conditions attached thereto as necessary or appropriate to the
purposes of the commission. department.
(7) Acquiring real property, or any interest in real property, by
lease, conveyance (including purchase) instead of foreclosure, or
foreclosure as necessary or appropriate to the purposes of the
commission. department.
(8) Owning, managing, operating, holding, clearing, improving,
and constructing facilities on real property as necessary or
appropriate to the purposes of the commission. department.
(9) Selling, assigning, exchanging, transferring, conveying,
leasing, mortgaging, or otherwise disposing of or encumbering
real property, or interests in real property or facilities on real
property as necessary or appropriate to the purposes of the
commission. department.
(10) Acquiring personal property by lease or conveyance as
necessary or appropriate to the purposes of the commission.
department.
(11) Selling, assigning, exchanging, transferring, conveying,
leasing, mortgaging, or otherwise disposing of or encumbering
personal property, or interests in personal property as necessary
or appropriate to the purposes of the commission. department.
(12) The powers enumerated in IC 5-26-3-6.
(13) Any other power necessary, proper, or convenient to carry
out this article.
SECTION 14. IC 5-26-2-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.42-2024,
SECTION 63, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The governor shall select a chair and vice
chair of the commission. The chair and vice chair serve at the pleasure
of the governor. an executive director of the department who:
(1) serves at the governor's pleasure; and
(2) is entitled to receive compensation in an amount set by the
governor.
(b) The chair may appoint staff needed to carry out this chapter from
the existing staff of participating agencies.
(c) The commission shall meet quarterly at the call of the chair.
(b) The executive director may appoint employees in the manner
provided by IC 4-15-2.2 and fix their compensation, subject to the
approval of the budget agency under IC 4-12-1-13.
SECTION 15. IC 5-26-2-7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 7. Each member of the commission who is not a state
employee is entitled to the minimum salary per diem provided by
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). The member is also entitled to reimbursement for
mileage, traveling expenses as provided under IC 4-13-1-4, and other
expenses actually incurred in connection with the member's duties as
provided in the state policies and procedures established by the Indiana
department of administration and approved by the budget agency.
SECTION 16. IC 5-26-2-8 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 8. Each member of the commission who is a state employee
is entitled to reimbursement for traveling expenses as provided under
IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses actually incurred in connection with
the member's duties as provided in the state policies and procedures
established by the Indiana department of administration and approved
by the budget agency.
SECTION 17. IC 5-26-2-8.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.42-2024,
SECTION 65, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.5. Expenses incurred under sections 7 and 8
section 6 of this chapter shall be paid from amounts appropriated to the
commission. department.
SECTION 18. IC 5-26-2-9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 9. The legislative members of the commission are entitled
to receive the same per diem, mileage, and travel allowances paid to
persons who serve as legislative members of interim study committees
established by the legislative council. Per diem, mileage, and travel
allowances paid under this section shall be paid from appropriations
made to the legislative council or the legislative services agency.
SECTION 19. IC 5-26-2-10 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. The commission
department is subject to the procurement procedures under IC 5-22.
SECTION 20. IC 5-26-2-11 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 11. On or before July 1, 2027, and July 1 biennially
thereafter, the commission shall submit a report to the executive
director of the legislative services agency, in an electronic format under
IC 5-14-6, for review by the interim committee on government in
accordance with IC 1-1-15.5-4 and IC 2-5-1.3-13(g). The report shall
describe:
(1) official action taken; and
(2) actionable items considered;
by the commission during the preceding two (2) years.
SECTION 21. IC 5-26-3-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The commission
department may contract for the establishment of a statewide wireless
public safety voice and data communications system.
(b) The system must:
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(1) be efficient;
(2) provide modern two (2) way voice or data communication to
user agencies without a duplication of efforts; and
(3) allow user agencies with compatible equipment to
communicate with one another, resulting in the efficient handling
of emergencies and cooperation between agencies.
SECTION 22. IC 5-26-3-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. If a public safety
agency or other entity decides to use the system, the agency or other
entity must enter into a user's agreement with the commission.
department.
SECTION 23. IC 5-26-3-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The commission
department is responsible for the supervision of the statewide wireless
public safety voice and data communications systems as follows:
(1) Maintenance of the main wide area transmitter sites and
interconnection links of the system.
(2) Management of the system's Federal Communications
Commission licensing.
(3) Frequency planning for the system.
(4) Management of the system.
(b) The Indiana statewide wireless public safety voice and data
communications system may use the facilities of commercial mobile
radio service providers (as defined in 47 USC U.S.C. 332). If the
commission department chooses to contract with one or more
commercial mobile radio service providers to provide the system, the
commission department may delegate the responsibilities in
subsection (a) to the commercial mobile radio service providers.
SECTION 24. IC 5-26-3-4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. The commission
department shall develop criteria for determining whether a public
safety agency or other entity may use the system. The commission
department may not prohibit a public safety agency from using the
public safety agency's own public safety voice and data
communications system.
SECTION 25. IC 5-26-3-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.66-2017,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. A public safety agency or other entity may join
the system with the approval of the commission. department.
SECTION 26. IC 5-26-3-6 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) In addition to the
powers enumerated in IC 5-26-2-5, the commission department has
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


the following powers related to the system:
(1) Ensuring that federal and state communications requirements
are followed.
(2) Providing system planning, including mutual aid planning and
compatibility planning with other public safety agency
communications systems.
(3) Creating a standard user agreement.
(4) Providing technical assistance to local public safety agencies
in making equipment purchases.
(5) Assessing charges for using the system.
(6) Entering into and performing use and occupancy agreements
concerning the system under IC 4-13.5.
(7) Exercising any power necessary to carry out this chapter.
(b) The Indiana statewide wireless public safety voice and data
communications system may use the facilities of commercial mobile
radio service providers (as defined in 47 USC U.S.C. 332). If the
commission department chooses to contract with one (1) or more
commercial mobile radio service providers to provide the system, the
commission department may delegate the responsibilities in
subsection (a) to the commercial mobile radio service providers.
SECTION 27. IC 5-26-3-7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 7. The following subcommittees are created:
(1) A user's subcommittee.
(2) A technical subcommittee.
(3) A finance subcommittee.
(4) Any other subcommittee as determined by the commission.
SECTION 28. IC 5-26-3-8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) The department shall issue a request for
proposals (RFP) (as defined in IC 5-22-2-28) for the purchase, or
before issuing a change order, of any communications systems and
equipment by the department that may be made available to public
safety agencies. The communications equipment must be
compatible with existing communications equipment used by
public safety agencies.
(b) Notwithstanding IC 5-22-9-10, proposals shall be evaluated
and awarded on a competitive basis using a scoring rubric
established by the department. The rubric must include specific
criteria developed by the department to ensure a transparent
selection process.
(c) Notwithstanding IC 5-22-9-7, all proposed contracts must be
approved by the budget agency before the department may enter
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


into a contract under this section.
(d) The department may provide reasonable notice to, and
coordinate procurement with, public safety agencies as
circumstances allow.
SECTION 29. IC 5-26-4-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.198-2016,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The integrated public safety emergency
communications fund is established to be used only to carry out the
purposes of this article. The fund shall be administered by the
commission. department.
(b) The fund consists of:
(1) appropriations from the general assembly;
(2) gifts;
(3) federal grants;
(4) fees and contributions from user agencies that the commission
department considers necessary to maintain and operate the
system;
(5) amounts distributed to the fund under IC 9; and
(6) money from any other source permitted by law.
(c) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public funds may be invested. Interest that accrues
from these investments shall be deposited in the fund.
(d) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not revert
to the state general fund.
(e) If federal funds are not sufficient to pay for the system, the
commission department shall transfer money from the fund to the
communications system infrastructure fund established by IC 5-26-5-4
in amounts sufficient to pay rentals and other obligations under use and
occupancy agreements or other contracts or leases relating to the
financing of the system under IC 4-13.5.
SECTION 30. IC 5-26-4-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The money in the
fund is annually appropriated as follows:
(1) To the commission, department, for its use, subject to the
approval of the budget agency, in the acquisition, construction,
equipping, operation, maintenance, and financing of the system
and state user equipment for the system, including the payment of
rentals and other obligations under use and occupancy agreements
or other contracts or leases relating to the financing of the system
under IC 4-13.5.
(2) To the state police department, such amounts as determined
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


by the budget agency that are sufficient to enable the state police
crime laboratory to address any backlog of cases to be processed
by the laboratory. The appropriations under this subdivision are
subject to the payment of rentals and other obligations under use
and occupancy agreements or other contracts or leases relating to
the financing of the system under IC 4-13.5.
SECTION 31. IC 5-26-5-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. The infrastructure
fund shall be administered by the commission. department. The
treasurer of state shall invest the money in the infrastructure fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the infrastructure fund in
the same manner as other public funds may be invested.
SECTION 32. IC 5-26-5-7 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. The commission
department may use the money in the infrastructure fund only to pay
the following:
(1) The cost of construction of communications system
infrastructure.
(2) The cost of acquisition or leasing of all real or personal
property required for the construction of communications system
infrastructure.
(3) The cost of operation and maintenance of communications
system infrastructure.
(4) The cost of demolishing or removing any buildings, structures,
or improvements on property acquired by the commission
department for the construction of communications system
infrastructure.
(5) Engineering and legal expenses, other professional services,
and the costs of plans, specifications, surveys, estimates, and any
necessary feasibility studies.
(6) Payment of rentals and other obligations and performance of
other obligations under use and occupancy agreements or other
contracts or leases relating to the financing of communications
system infrastructure under IC 4-13.5.
SECTION 33. IC 5-26-5-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.235-2005,
SECTION 92, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. The commission department shall pay its
obligations under any use and occupancy agreement or any other
contract or lease with the Indiana finance authority from money
deposited in the infrastructure fund before making any other
disbursement or expenditure of the money.
SECTION 34. IC 5-26-5-9 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. There is annually
appropriated to the commission department the money in the
infrastructure fund for its use, subject to the approval of the budget
agency, in carrying out the purposes described in section 7 of this
chapter.
SECTION 35. IC 9-13-2-49.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 49.8. "Emergency
communications fund" refers to the emergency communications
fund established by IC 5-26-4-1.
SECTION 36. IC 9-13-2-82.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 82.5. "Integrated public safety communications fund"
refers to the integrated public safety communications fund established
by IC 5-26-4-1.
SECTION 37. IC 9-17-2-14.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.141-2024,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14.5. (a) The bureau may:
(1) make investigations or require additional information; and
(2) reject an application or request;
if the bureau is not satisfied of the genuineness, regularity, or legality
of an application or the truth of a statement in an application, or for any
other reason.
(b) If the bureau is satisfied that the person applying for a certificate
of title for a vehicle is the owner of the vehicle, the bureau shall issue
a certificate of title for the vehicle after the person pays the applicable
fee under subsection (c) or (d).
(c) The fee for a certificate of title for a vehicle other than a
watercraft is fifteen dollars ($15). Except as provided in subsection (e),
the fee shall be distributed as follows:
(1) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(2) To the motor vehicle highway account as follows:
(A) For a title issued before January 1, 2017, one dollar ($1).
(B) For a title issued after December 31, 2016, three dollars
and twenty-five cents ($3.25).
(3) For a title issued before January 1, 2017, three dollars ($3) to
the highway, road and street fund.
(4) Five dollars ($5) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(5) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(6) To the commission fund as follows:
(A) For a title issued before January 1, 2017, four dollars and
twenty-five cents ($4.25).
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(B) For a title issued after December 31, 2016, five dollars
($5).
(d) The fee for a certificate of title for a watercraft is as follows:
(1) For a certificate of title issued before January 1, 2017, fifteen
dollars and fifty cents ($15.50). The fee shall be distributed as
follows:
(A) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(B) Two dollars ($2) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(C) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(D) Four dollars and seventy-five cents ($4.75) to the
commission fund.
(E) Seven dollars ($7) to the department of natural resources.
(2) For a certificate of title issued after December 31, 2016,
fifteen dollars ($15). The fee shall be distributed as follows:
(A) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(B) Three dollars and twenty-five cents ($3.25) to the motor
vehicle highway account.
(C) Five dollars ($5) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(D) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(E) Five dollars ($5) to the commission fund.
(e) Fees paid by dealers under this section shall be deposited in the
motor vehicle odometer fund.
(f) Except as provided in subsection (g), the bureau shall deliver a
certificate of title:
(1) to the person that owns the vehicle for which the certificate of
title was issued, if no lien or encumbrance appears on the
certificate of title; or
(2) if a lien or an encumbrance appears on the certificate of title,
to the person that holds the lien or encumbrance as set forth in the
application for the certificate of title.
(g) If a certificate of title is maintained electronically by the bureau,
the bureau is not required to physically deliver the certificate of title
but shall provide notification:
(1) to the person who owns the vehicle for which the certificate of
title was issued, if no lien or encumbrance appears on the
certificate of title; or
(2) if a lien or an encumbrance appears on the certificate of title,
to the person that holds the lien or an encumbrance as set forth in
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


the application for the certificate of title.
SECTION 38. IC 9-17-2-14.7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.108-2019,
SECTION 161, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14.7. (a) This section does not
apply to a mobile home or a manufactured home.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), a person must apply for a
certificate of title for a vehicle within forty-five (45) days after the date
on which the person acquires the vehicle.
(c) A person that acquires a vehicle through a transfer on death
conveyance under IC 9-17-3-9 must apply for a certificate of title for
the vehicle within sixty (60) days after the date on which the person
acquires the vehicle.
(d) A person that owns a vehicle and becomes an Indiana resident
must apply for a certificate of title for the vehicle within sixty (60) days
after the date on which the person becomes an Indiana resident.
(e) A person that violates this section with respect to a certificate of
title for a vehicle other than a watercraft shall pay to the bureau an
administrative penalty as follows:
(1) For a violation that occurs before January 1, 2017, an
administrative penalty of twenty-one dollars and fifty cents
($21.50). The administrative penalty shall be distributed as
follows:
(A) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(B) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(C) Three dollars ($3) to the highway, road and street fund.
(D) Five dollars ($5) to the motor vehicle highway account.
(E) One dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) to the integrated public
safety emergency communications fund.
(F) Eleven dollars and twenty-five cents ($11.25) to the
commission fund.
(2) For a violation that occurs after December 31, 2016, an
administrative penalty of thirty dollars ($30). The administrative
penalty shall be distributed as follows:
(A) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(B) Twenty-eight dollars and seventy-five cents ($28.75) to the
commission fund.
(f) A person that violates this section with respect to a certificate of
title for a watercraft shall pay to the bureau an administrative penalty
as follows:
(1) For a violation that occurs before January 1, 2017, an
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


administrative penalty of twenty dollars ($20). The administrative
penalty shall be distributed as follows:
(A) Three dollars ($3) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(B) Eight dollars ($8) to the department of natural resources.
(C) Nine dollars ($9) to the commission fund.
(2) For a violation that occurs after December 31, 2016, an
administrative penalty of thirty dollars ($30). The administrative
penalty shall be distributed as follows:
(A) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(B) Two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) to the commission
fund.
(C) Twenty-seven dollars and twenty-five cents ($27.25) to the
department of natural resources.
SECTION 39. IC 9-17-3-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.205-2025,
SECTION 53, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) If a certificate of title:
(1) is lost or stolen;
(2) is mutilated;
(3) is destroyed; or
(4) becomes illegible;
the person that owns the vehicle or the legal representative or legal
successor in interest of the person that owns the vehicle for which the
certificate of title was issued, as shown by the records of the bureau,
shall apply for and may obtain a duplicate certificate of title.
(b) To obtain a duplicate certificate of title under subsection (a), a
person must:
(1) furnish information satisfactory to the bureau concerning the
loss, theft, mutilation, destruction, or illegibility of the certificate
of title; and
(2) pay the applicable fee under subsection (e) or (f).
(c) The word "duplicate" shall be notated on the certificate of title
issued under this section.
(d) When a duplicate certificate of title is issued, the previous
certificate of title becomes void.
(e) The fee for a duplicate certificate of title issued before January
1, 2017, for a vehicle other than a watercraft is eight dollars ($8). The
fee shall be distributed as follows:
(1) One dollar ($1) to the motor vehicle highway account.
(2) One dollar ($1) to the highway, road and street fund.
(3) Six dollars ($6) to the commission fund.
(f) The fee for a duplicate certificate of title issued before January
1, 2017, for a watercraft is fifteen dollars and fifty cents ($15.50). The
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


fee shall be distributed as follows:
(1) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(2) Two dollars ($2) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(3) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(4) Four dollars and seventy-five cents ($4.75) to the commission
fund.
(5) Seven dollars ($7) to the department of natural resources.
(g) The fee for a duplicate certificate of title issued after December
31, 2016, is fifteen dollars ($15). Except as provided in subsection (h),
the fee shall be distributed as follows:
(1) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(2) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the department of
natural resources.
(3) Three dollars and twenty-five cents ($3.25) to the motor
vehicle highway account.
(4) Five dollars ($5) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(5) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(6) Three dollars and seventy-five cents ($3.75) to the
commission fund.
(h) After June 30, 2024, when a fee imposed under subsection (g)
is collected by the department, instead of depositing three dollars and
seventy-five cents ($3.75) into the commission fund as required by
subsection (g)(6), the department shall instead deposit one dollar and
eighty-eight cents ($1.88) of that amount into the motor carrier
regulation fund established by IC 8-2.1-23-1, and the remainder shall
be deposited in the commission fund.
SECTION 40. IC 9-17-4-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.256-2017,
SECTION 107, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Not more than twenty (20)
days after a person becomes the owner, custodian, or possessor of a
vehicle that:
(1) does not have a manufacturer's identification number installed
on the vehicle; or
(2) has an original manufacturer's identification number that is
altered, destroyed, obliterated, or defaced;
the person shall apply to the bureau for permission to make or stamp a
special identification number on the vehicle.
(b) The bureau shall prescribe the form and manner of an
application under subsection (a). The application must contain the
following:
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(1) A description of the vehicle, including the make, style, and
year of model of the vehicle.
(2) A description of:
(A) the original manufacturer's identification number, if
possible; or
(B) any distinguishing marks on the engine or body of the
vehicle.
(3) The name and address of the applicant.
(4) The date on which the applicant purchased or took possession
of the vehicle.
(5) The name and address of the person from whom the applicant
purchased or acquired the vehicle.
(6) An application fee in an amount under subsection (c) or (d),
as applicable.
(7) Any other information the bureau requires.
(c) The fee for an application for an identification number other than
a hull identification number that is submitted before January 1, 2017,
is thirteen dollars ($13). The fee shall be distributed as follows:
(1) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(2) One dollar ($1) to the highway, road and street fund.
(3) One dollar ($1) to the motor vehicle highway account.
(4) One dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) to the integrated public
safety emergency communications fund.
(5) Four dollars ($4) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(6) Five dollars ($5) to the commission fund.
(d) The fee for an application for a hull identification number that
is submitted before January 1, 2017, is ten dollars and fifty cents
($10.50). The fee shall be distributed as follows:
(1) Two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) to the department of
natural resources.
(2) Four dollars ($4) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(3) Four dollars ($4) to the commission fund.
(e) The fee for an application for an identification number that is
submitted after December 31, 2016, is ten dollars ($10). The fee shall
be distributed as follows:
(1) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
account.
(2) Three dollars and twenty-five cents ($3.25) to the motor
vehicle highway account.
(3) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(4) Five dollars ($5) to the commission fund.
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(f) A person that owns or possesses a vehicle described in
subsection (a) and fails to comply with this section commits a Class B
infraction.
SECTION 41. IC 9-18.1-5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.108-2019,
SECTION 162, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The bureau shall classify the
following as a passenger motor vehicle, regardless of the vehicle's
gross vehicle weight rating:
(1) A low speed vehicle.
(2) A hearse.
(3) A motor vehicle that is funeral equipment and used in the
operation of funeral services (as defined in IC 25-15-2-17).
(4) A medical services vehicle.
(b) The fee to register a passenger motor vehicle is twenty-one
dollars and thirty-five cents ($21.35). The fee shall be distributed as
follows:
(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(2) Thirty cents ($0.30) to the spinal cord and brain injury fund.
(3) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(4) Two dollars and ninety cents ($2.90) to the highway, road and
street fund.
(5) Three dollars ($3) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(6) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(7) Three dollars and ten cents ($3.10) to the commission fund.
(8) Any remaining amount to the motor vehicle highway account.
SECTION 42. IC 9-18.1-5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.108-2019,
SECTION 163, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. The fee to register a motorcycle
or motor driven cycle is twenty-six dollars and thirty-five cents
($26.35). The fee shall be distributed as follows:
(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(2) Thirty cents ($0.30) to the spinal cord and brain injury fund.
(3) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(4) Two dollars and ninety cents ($2.90) to the highway, road and
street fund.
(5) Four dollars ($4) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(6) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(7) Three dollars and ten cents ($3.10) to the commission fund.
(8) Seven dollars ($7) to the motorcycle operator safety education
fund.
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(9) Any remaining amount to the motor vehicle highway account.
SECTION 43. IC 9-18.1-5-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.108-2019,
SECTION 164, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The fee to register a
not-for-hire bus is sixteen dollars and thirty-five cents ($16.35).
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), a fee imposed and
collected under subsection (a) shall be distributed as follows:
(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(2) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(3) Two dollars and ninety cents ($2.90) to the highway, road and
street fund.
(4) Four dollars ($4) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(5) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(6) Three dollars and ten cents ($3.10) to the commission fund.
(7) Any remaining amount to the motor vehicle highway account.
(c) A fee described in subsection (a) that is collected under the
International Registration Plan shall be distributed as set forth in
section 10.5 of this chapter.
SECTION 44. IC 9-18.1-5-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.156-2020,
SECTION 43, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. The fee to register a collector vehicle is sixteen
dollars and thirty-five cents ($16.35). The fee shall be distributed as
follows:
(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(2) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
account.
(3) Two dollars and ninety cents ($2.90) to the highway, road and
street fund.
(4) Four dollars ($4) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(5) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(6) Three dollars and ten cents ($3.10) to the commission fund.
(7) Any remaining amount to the motor vehicle highway account.
SECTION 45. IC 9-18.1-5-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.108-2019,
SECTION 165, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. The fee to register a recreational
vehicle is twenty-nine dollars and thirty-five cents ($29.35). The fee
shall be distributed as follows:
(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(2) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(3) Two dollars and ninety cents ($2.90) to the highway, road and
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


street fund.
(4) Four dollars ($4) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(5) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(6) Three dollars and ten cents ($3.10) to the commission fund.
(7) Any remaining amount to the motor vehicle highway account.
SECTION 46. IC 9-18.1-5-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.108-2019,
SECTION 166, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. The fee to register special
machinery is sixteen dollars and thirty-five cents ($16.35). The fee
shall be distributed as follows:
(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(2) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(3) Two dollars and ninety cents ($2.90) to the highway, road and
street fund.
(4) Four dollars ($4) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(5) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(6) Three dollars and ten cents ($3.10) to the commission fund.
(7) Any remaining amount to the motor vehicle highway account.
SECTION 47. IC 9-18.1-5-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.159-2021,
SECTION 38, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) Except as provided in sections 11 and 13 of
this chapter, the fee to register a trailer is as follows:
Declared Gross Weight (Pounds) Fee ($)
Greater than Equal to
or less than
0 3,000 $ 16.35
3,000 9,000 25.35
9,000 12,000 72
12,000 16,000 108
16,000 22,000 168
22,000 228
(b) A fee described in subsection (a) that is collected by the
department from a person registering under the International
Registration Plan shall be prorated based on the Indiana mileage
percentage of the trucks and tractors registered by the person under the
International Registration Plan pursuant to section 9 of this chapter.
The prorated amount shall be distributed as set forth in section 10.5 of
this chapter.
(c) A fee described in subsection (a) that is not required to be
distributed under subsection (b) shall be distributed as follows:
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(2) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(3) Two dollars and ninety cents ($2.90) to the highway, road and
street fund.
(4) Four dollars ($4) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(5) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(6) Three dollars and ten cents ($3.10) to the commission fund.
(7) Any remaining amount to the motor vehicle highway account.
SECTION 48. IC 9-18.1-5-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.108-2019,
SECTION 168, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) Except as provided in section
11 of this chapter, the fee to register a truck, a tractor used with a
semitrailer, or a for-hire bus is determined as follows:
Declared Gross Weight (Pounds) Fee ($)
Greater than Equal to
or less than
0 11,000 $ 30.35
11,000 16,000 144
16,000 26,000 180
26,000 36,000 372
36,000 48,000 624
48,000 66,000 900
66,000 78,000 1,200
78,000 1,692
(b) A fee described in subsection (a) that is collected under the
International Registration Plan shall be distributed as set forth in
section 10.5 of this chapter.
(c) A fee described in subsection (a) that is not required to be
distributed under subsection (b) shall be distributed as follows:
(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(2) For a truck with a declared gross weight of eleven thousand
(11,000) pounds or less, thirty cents ($0.30) to the spinal cord and
brain injury fund.
(3) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(4) Two dollars and ninety cents ($2.90) to the highway, road and
street fund.
(5) Four dollars ($4) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(6) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(7) Three dollars and ten cents ($3.10) to the commission fund.
(8) Any remaining amount to the motor vehicle highway account.
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(d) A trailer that is towed by a truck must be registered separately,
and the appropriate fee must be paid under this chapter.
SECTION 49. IC 9-18.1-5-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.11-2023,
SECTION 39, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) The following vehicles shall be registered
as semitrailers:
(1) A semitrailer converted to a full trailer through the use of a
converter dolly.
(2) A trailer drawn behind a semitrailer.
(3) A trailer drawn by a vehicle registered under the International
Registration Plan.
(b) The fee for a permanent registration of a semitrailer is
eighty-two dollars ($82).
(c) A fee described in subsection (b) that is collected for a
registration issued through an Indiana based International Registration
Plan account shall be distributed as set forth in section 10.5 of this
chapter.
(d) The fee described in subsection (b) that is not required to be
distributed under subsection (c) shall be distributed as follows:
(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(2) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(3) Two dollars and ninety cents ($2.90) to the highway, road and
street fund.
(4) Twelve dollars ($12) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(5) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(6) Three dollars and ten cents ($3.10) to the commission fund.
(7) Any remaining amount to the motor vehicle highway account.
(e) A permanent registration under subsection (b) must be renewed
on an annual basis to pay all applicable excise taxes. There is no fee to
renew a permanent registration under subsection (b).
(f) A permanent registration under subsection (b) may be transferred
under IC 9-18.1-11.
SECTION 50. IC 9-18.1-6-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.205-2025,
SECTION 55, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) Except as provided in subsection (e), the fee
to register a recovery vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating greater
than sixteen thousand (16,000) pounds is five hundred four dollars
($504).
(b) Except as provided in subsection (e), the fee to register a
recovery vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating equal to or less than
sixteen thousand (16,000) pounds is seventy-two dollars ($72).
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(c) Except as provided in subsection (d), a fee imposed and
collected under subsection (a) or (b) shall be distributed as follows:
(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(2) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(3) Two dollars and ninety cents ($2.90) to the highway, road and
street fund.
(4) Four dollars ($4) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(5) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(6) Three dollars and ten cents ($3.10) to the commission fund
(except as provided in subsection (f)).
(7) Any remaining amount to the motor vehicle highway account.
(d) A fee described in subsection (a) that is collected under the
International Registration Plan shall be distributed as set forth in
IC 9-18.1-5-10.5.
(e) The fee to register a recovery vehicle for a period other than
twelve (12) months is the amount determined under the following
formula:
STEP ONE: Determine the number of months remaining until the
vehicle's next registration date under IC 9-18.1-11. A partial
month shall be rounded to one (1) month.
STEP TWO: Multiply the STEP ONE result by one-twelfth
(1/12).
STEP THREE: Multiply the STEP TWO product by the
applicable registration fee under subsection (a) or (b) for the
vehicle.
A fee imposed and collected under this subsection that is not collected
under the International Registration Plan shall be distributed under
subsection (c). A fee imposed and collected under this subsection that
is collected under the International Registration Plan shall be
distributed under subsection (d).
(f) Beginning after June 30, 2024, when a fee imposed under
subsection (a) or (b) is collected by the department of state revenue,
instead of depositing three dollars and ten cents ($3.10) into the
commission fund as required by subsection (c)(6), the department shall
instead deposit ninety percent (90%) of that amount into the motor
carrier regulation fund established by IC 8-2.1-23-1, and the remainder
shall be deposited in the commission fund.
SECTION 51. IC 9-18.1-7-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.108-2019,
SECTION 172, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. A fee to register a farm vehicle
under section 3 or 4 of this chapter shall be distributed as follows:
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(2) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(3) Two dollars ($2) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(4) Two dollars and ninety cents ($2.90) to the highway, road and
street fund.
(5) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(6) Three dollars and ten cents ($3.10) to the commission fund.
(7) Any remaining amount to the motor vehicle highway account.
SECTION 52. IC 9-18.1-7-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.108-2019,
SECTION 173, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The fee for permanent
registration of a farm vehicle that is a semitrailer is forty-one dollars
($41). The fee shall be distributed as follows:
(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(2) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(3) Two dollars and ninety cents ($2.90) to the highway, road and
street fund.
(4) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(5) Three dollars and ten cents ($3.10) to the commission fund.
(6) Six dollars ($6) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(7) Any remaining amount to the motor vehicle highway account.
(b) A permanent registration under subsection (a) must be renewed
on an annual basis to pay all applicable excise tax. There is no fee to
renew a permanent registration under subsection (a).
SECTION 53. IC 9-18.1-7-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.108-2019,
SECTION 174, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) If a person has registered a
vehicle as a farm vehicle and the person:
(1) desires to register the vehicle as a vehicle other than a farm
vehicle; or
(2) operates the vehicle in the conduct of a commercial enterprise;
the person shall apply to the bureau to change the registration from
registration as a farm vehicle to the applicable registration for the
vehicle under IC 9-18.1-5.
(b) The bureau shall issue to a person described in subsection (a) an
amended certificate of registration and the appropriate license plate
after the person pays the following:
(1) A fee of nine dollars and fifty cents ($9.50). The fee shall be
distributed as follows:
(A) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(B) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(C) One dollar ($1) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(D) One dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) to the motor vehicle
highway account.
(E) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(F) Five dollars ($5) to the commission fund.
(2) Any additional excise taxes owed under IC 6-6 on the vehicle
to which the registration is transferred.
(3) If the vehicle was registered as a farm semitrailer, a fee of
forty-one dollars ($41). The fee shall be distributed to the motor
vehicle highway account.
(4) If the vehicle was registered as a farm vehicle other than a
farm semitrailer, the amount determined under the following
formula:
STEP ONE: Determine the number of months between:
(i) the date on which the farm vehicle is registered as a
vehicle other than a farm vehicle or is operated in the
conduct of a commercial enterprise; and
(ii) the next registration date under IC 9-18.1-11 of the farm
vehicle.
A partial month shall be rounded to one (1) month.
STEP TWO: Multiply the STEP ONE result by one-twelfth
(1/12).
STEP THREE: Determine the product of:
(i) the STEP TWO result; multiplied by
(ii) the applicable fee under IC 9-18.1-5 for the classification
to which the vehicle's registration is changed.
The amount determined under this subdivision shall be deposited
in the motor vehicle highway account.
SECTION 54. IC 9-18.1-8-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.108-2019,
SECTION 175, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. The registration of a military
vehicle under this chapter is permanent. The fee for the permanent
registration of a military vehicle is twelve dollars ($12). The fee shall
be distributed as follows:
(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(2) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(3) Two dollars and ninety cents ($2.90) to the highway, road and
street fund.
(4) Four dollars ($4) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(5) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(6) Three dollars and ten cents ($3.10) to the commission fund.
SECTION 55. IC 9-18.1-11-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.156-2020,
SECTION 44, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) A person that sells or otherwise disposes of
a vehicle, including a wrecked or destroyed vehicle, owned by the
person before the date on which the vehicle's registration expires may
apply to the bureau to transfer the registration and license plates to a
vehicle acquired or owned by the person.
(b) This subsection applies if the vehicle to which the registration
and license plate are transferred is of the same type and in the same
weight class as the vehicle for which the registration and license plate
were originally issued. The bureau shall transfer the registration and
license plate and issue an amended certificate of registration to the
person applying for the transfer after the person pays the following:
(1) A fee of nine dollars and fifty cents ($9.50). The fee shall be
distributed as follows:
(A) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(B) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(C) One dollar ($1) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(D) One dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) to the motor vehicle
highway account.
(E) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(F) Five dollars ($5) to the commission fund.
(2) Any additional excise taxes owed under IC 6-6 on the vehicle
to which the registration is transferred.
(c) This subsection applies if a vehicle to which the registration is
transferred is of a different type or in a different weight class than the
vehicle for which the registration and license plate were originally
issued. The bureau shall transfer the registration and license plate and
issue to the person applying for the transfer an amended certificate of
registration and, if necessary, a new license plate or other proof of
registration under this article or IC 9-18.5 after the person pays the
following:
(1) A fee of nine dollars and fifty cents ($9.50). The fee shall be
distributed as follows:
(A) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(B) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(C) One dollar ($1) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(D) One dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) to the motor vehicle
highway account.
(E) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(F) Five dollars ($5) to the commission fund.
(2) Any additional excise taxes owed under IC 6-6 on the vehicle
to which the registration is transferred.
(3) If the fee to register the vehicle to which the registration is
transferred exceeds by more than ten dollars ($10) the fee to
register the vehicle for which the registration was originally
issued, the amount determined under the following formula:
STEP ONE: Determine the number of months between:
(i) the date on which the vehicle to which the registration is
transferred was acquired; and
(ii) the next registration date under this chapter for a vehicle
registered by the person.
A partial month shall be rounded to one (1) month.
STEP TWO: Multiply the STEP ONE result by one-twelfth
(1/12).
STEP THREE: Determine the difference between:
(i) the registration fee for the vehicle to which the
registration is transferred; minus
(ii) the registration fee for the vehicle for which the
registration was originally issued.
STEP FOUR: Determine the product of:
(i) the STEP TWO result; multiplied by
(ii) the STEP THREE result.
A fee collected under this subdivision shall be deposited in the
motor vehicle highway account.
(d) A person may register a vehicle to which a registration is
transferred under this section:
(1) individually; or
(2) with one (1) or more other persons.
SECTION 56. IC 9-18.1-11-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 135, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) If a license plate or other
proof of registration is stolen, the person in whose name the license
plate or other proof of registration was issued shall notify:
(1) the Indiana law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction
where the theft occurred; or
(2) the law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction over the
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


address listed on the registration for the vehicle for which the
license plate or other proof of registration was issued;
that the original license plate or other proof of registration has been
stolen.
(b) A person may apply to the bureau to replace a license plate or
other proof of registration that is lost, stolen, destroyed, or damaged.
The bureau shall issue a duplicate or replacement license plate or other
proof of registration after the person does the following:
(1) Pays a fee of nine dollars and fifty cents ($9.50). The fee shall
be distributed as follows:
(A) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(B) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(C) One dollar ($1) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(D) One dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) to the motor vehicle
highway account.
(E) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(F) Five dollars ($5) to the commission fund.
However, the bureau may waive the fee under this subsection for
a duplicate certificate of registration that is processed on the
website of the bureau.
(2) If the proof of registration was lost or stolen, provides proof of
compliance with subsection (a) in a manner and form prescribed
by the bureau.
(c) A replacement proof of registration must be kept or displayed in
the same manner as the original proof of registration.
SECTION 57. IC 9-18.1-11-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.108-2019,
SECTION 178, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) A person that owns a vehicle
may apply to the bureau to change the ownership of the vehicle:
(1) by adding at least one (1) other person as a joint owner; or
(2) if the person is a joint owner of the vehicle, by transferring the
person's ownership interest in a vehicle to at least one (1)
remaining joint owner.
(b) The bureau shall issue an amended certificate of registration to
a person that applies under subsection (a) after the person does the
following:
(1) Complies with IC 9-17.
(2) Pays a fee of nine dollars and fifty cents ($9.50).
(c) A person may apply to the bureau to amend any obsolete or
incorrect information contained in a certificate of registration. The
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


bureau shall issue an amended certificate of registration after the
person pays a fee of nine dollars and fifty cents ($9.50).
(d) The bureau may not impose or collect a fee for a duplicate, an
amended, or a replacement certificate of registration that is issued as
a result of an error on the part of the bureau.
(e) A fee described in subsection (b)(2) or (c) shall be distributed as
follows:
(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(2) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(3) One dollar ($1) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(4) One dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) to the motor vehicle
highway account.
(5) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(6) Five dollars ($5) to the commission fund.
SECTION 58. IC 9-18.1-11-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.108-2019,
SECTION 179, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) A person that owns a vehicle
may apply to the bureau in a manner and form prescribed by the bureau
to display on the vehicle a license plate that is different from the
license plate that is displayed on the vehicle at the time of application.
The bureau shall issue the different license plate and an amended
certificate of registration after the person pays the following:
(1) Any fees required under IC 9-18.5 to obtain the different
license plate.
(2) If the application is not part of the person's registration or
renewal process, an additional plate change fee of nine dollars
and fifty cents ($9.50).
(b) The fee described in subsection (a)(2) shall be distributed as
follows:
(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(2) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(3) One dollar ($1) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(4) One dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) to the motor vehicle
highway account.
(5) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(6) Five dollars ($5) to the commission fund.
SECTION 59. IC 9-18.1-12-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.227-2025,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) A person may apply to the bureau for a
temporary registration permit for a vehicle. The bureau shall issue the
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


person a temporary registration permit after the person does the
following:
(1) Provides proof of financial responsibility in effect with respect
to the vehicle in the amounts specified under IC 9-25.
(2) Pays a fee of eighteen dollars ($18). The fee shall be
distributed as follows:
(A) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(B) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(C) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(D) Five dollars ($5) to the commission fund.
(E) Any remaining amount to the motor vehicle highway
account.
(b) A temporary registration permit is valid for a period of thirty
(30) days from the date of issuance and authorizes the use of the
vehicle on a highway if any of the following conditions exist:
(1) The person has purchased or otherwise obtained the vehicle
in Indiana and will be titling or registering the vehicle in another
state or foreign country.
(2) The person is an Indiana resident and is intending to move to
another state and the current vehicle registration or temporary
permit will expire before the person moves.
(3) The person is an Indiana resident and the vehicle registration
in another state has expired and the person has applied under
IC 9-17 for a title for the vehicle.
(4) The person owns and operates the vehicle and the person:
(A) does not operate the vehicle as a lessor; and
(B) moves the empty vehicle from one (1) lessee-carrier to
another.
(5) The person owns a vehicle for which emissions testing is
required and the vehicle will require further mechanical repairs
in order to comply with the emissions testing requirements.
(c) A temporary registration permit shall be displayed on a vehicle
in a manner determined by the bureau.
(d) The bureau may issue a temporary registration permit under this
section at the bureau's discretion if the person complies with subsection
(a) and applies in a form and manner prescribed by the bureau.
SECTION 60. IC 9-18.1-12-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.111-2021,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A person that owns a vehicle may apply to
the bureau for a temporary delivery permit to operate the vehicle
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


without obtaining a certificate of title or registration for the vehicle as
set forth in subsection (b). The bureau shall issue the person a
temporary delivery permit after the person does the following:
(1) Provides proof of financial responsibility in effect with respect
to the vehicle in the amounts specified under this article in the
form required by the bureau.
(2) Pays a fee of eighteen dollars ($18). The fee shall be
distributed as follows:
(A) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(B) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(C) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(D) Five dollars ($5) to the commission fund.
(E) Any remaining amount to the motor vehicle highway
account.
(b) A temporary delivery permit issued under subsection (a) is valid
for a period of ninety-six (96) hours beginning with the time of
issuance and authorizes the person or the person's agent or employee
to operate the vehicle upon a highway for the purpose of delivering, or
having delivered, the vehicle to any of the following locations:
(1) A place of storage, including the person's residence or place
of business.
(2) An inspection station for purposes of emissions testing under
IC 13-17-5-5.1(b).
(3) A license branch or a location operated by a full service
provider (as defined in IC 9-14.1-1-2) or a partial services
provider (as defined in IC 9-14.1-1-3) to register the vehicle under
this article.
(c) A temporary delivery permit must be displayed on a vehicle in
a manner determined by the bureau.
(d) A person that uses a temporary permit:
(1) for a period greater than ninety-six (96) hours; or
(2) for a purpose not specified in subsection (b);
commits a Class C infraction.
SECTION 61. IC 9-18.1-14-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.111-2021,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) If a certificate of registration or decal issued
for an off-road vehicle or a snowmobile that is registered under this
chapter is lost, stolen, destroyed, or damaged, the owner of the off-road
vehicle or snowmobile may apply to the bureau for a replacement
certificate of registration or decal. If the certificate of registration or
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


decal is stolen, the owner shall provide notice of the theft to a law
enforcement agency with jurisdiction over:
(1) the site of the theft; or
(2) the address listed on the certificate of registration.
(b) The bureau shall issue a replacement certificate of registration
or decal to the owner of an off-road vehicle or a snowmobile after the
owner:
(1) pays a fee of nine dollars and fifty cents ($9.50); and
(2) provides notice as required under subsection (a), if applicable.
(c) The fee imposed under subsection (b) shall be distributed as
follows:
(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(2) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(3) One dollar ($1) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(4) One dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) to the motor vehicle
highway account.
(5) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(6) Five dollars ($5) to the commission fund.
(d) A replacement certificate of registration or decal issued under
this section must be attached and displayed in the same manner as the
original certificate of registration or decal.
SECTION 62. IC 9-18.1-14-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.108-2019,
SECTION 184, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) A person that owns an
off-road vehicle or a snowmobile that is registered under this chapter
may apply to the bureau to change the ownership of the off-road
vehicle or snowmobile:
(1) by adding at least one (1) other person as a joint owner; or
(2) if the person is a joint owner of the off-road vehicle or
snowmobile, by transferring the person's ownership interest in the
off-road vehicle or snowmobile to at least one (1) remaining joint
owner.
(b) The bureau shall issue an amended certificate of registration to
a person that applies under subsection (a) after the person does the
following:
(1) Complies with IC 9-17.
(2) Pays a fee of nine dollars and fifty cents ($9.50).
(c) A person may apply to the bureau to amend any obsolete or
incorrect information contained in the certificate of registration issued
with respect to the off-road vehicle or snowmobile. The bureau shall
issue an amended certificate of registration after the person pays a fee
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


of nine dollars and fifty cents ($9.50).
(d) The bureau may not impose or collect a fee for a duplicate, an
amended, or a replacement certificate of registration that is issued as
a result of an error on the part of the bureau.
(e) A fee described in subsection (b)(2) or (c) shall be distributed as
follows:
(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(2) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(3) One dollar ($1) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(4) One dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) to the motor vehicle
highway account.
(5) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(6) Five dollars ($5) to the commission fund.
SECTION 63. IC 9-18.1-14.5-11, AS AMENDED BY
P.L.111-2021, SECTION 23, IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) If a certificate
of registration or decal issued for a watercraft that is registered under
this chapter is lost, stolen, destroyed, or damaged, the owner of the
watercraft may apply to the bureau for a replacement certificate of
registration or decal. If the certificate of registration or decal is stolen,
the owner shall provide notice of the theft to a law enforcement agency
with jurisdiction over:
(1) the site of the theft; or
(2) the address listed on the certificate of registration.
(b) The bureau shall issue a replacement certificate of registration
or decal to the owner of a watercraft after the owner pays a fee of nine
dollars and fifty cents ($9.50).
(c) The fee imposed under subsection (b) shall be distributed as
follows:
(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(2) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(3) One dollar ($1) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(4) One dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) to the motor vehicle
highway account.
(5) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(6) Five dollars ($5) to the commission fund.
(d) A replacement certificate of registration or decal issued under
this section must be attached and displayed in the same manner as the
original certificate of registration or decal.
SECTION 64. IC 9-18.1-14.5-12, AS ADDED BY P.L.164-2020,
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


SECTION 38, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) A person that owns a watercraft that is
registered under this chapter may apply to the bureau to change the
ownership of the watercraft:
(1) by adding at least one (1) other person as a joint owner; or
(2) if the person is a joint owner of the watercraft, by transferring
the person's ownership interest in the watercraft to at least one (1)
remaining joint owner.
(b) The bureau shall issue an amended certificate of registration to
a person that applies under subsection (a) after the person does the
following:
(1) Complies with IC 9-17.
(2) Pays the fee of nine dollars and fifty cents ($9.50).
(c) A person may apply to the bureau to amend any obsolete or
incorrect information contained in the certificate of registration issued
with respect to the watercraft. The bureau shall issue an amended
certificate of registration after the person pays a fee of nine dollars and
fifty cents ($9.50).
(d) The bureau may not impose or collect a fee for a duplicate,
amended, or replacement certificate of registration that is issued as a
result of an error on the part of the bureau.
(e) A fee described in subsection (b)(2) or (c) shall be distributed as
follows:
(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(2) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(3) One dollar ($1) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(4) One dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) to the motor vehicle
highway account.
(5) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(6) Five dollars ($5) to the commission fund.
SECTION 65. IC 9-18.5-4-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.108-2019,
SECTION 185, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) A vehicle for a which a
license plate is issued under section 1 of this chapter is exempt from
the applicable registration fee for the vehicle under IC 9-18 (before its
expiration), IC 9-29-5 (before its repeal), or IC 9-18.1-5.
(b) A vehicle described in subsection (a) is subject to a service
charge as follows:
(1) For a license plate issued before January 1, 2017, five dollars
and seventy-five cents ($5.75). The service charge shall be
distributed as follows:
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(A) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(B) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(C) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(D) Three dollars and seventy-five cents ($3.75) to the
commission fund.
(2) For a license plate issued after December 31, 2016, five
dollars ($5). The service charge shall be distributed as follows:
(A) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(B) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(C) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(D) Three dollars ($3) to the commission fund.
SECTION 66. IC 9-18.5-9-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.108-2019,
SECTION 186, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The fee for a license plate
issued under this chapter is eight dollars ($8).
(b) A fee collected under subsection (a) shall be distributed as
follows:
(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
(2) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(3) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(4) Five dollars ($5) to the commission fund.
(5) Any remaining amount to the motor vehicle highway account.
SECTION 67. IC 9-18.5-12-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.256-2017,
SECTION 143, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) Except as provided in
IC 9-18.5-28, the bureau shall collect an annual supplemental fee of
fifteen dollars ($15) with respect to each special group recognition
license plate issued under this article. The annual supplemental fee is
in addition to a fee imposed under section 14(d)(2) or 15(b) of this
chapter.
(b) An annual supplemental fee collected under subsection (a) shall
be distributed as follows:
(1) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(2) One dollar ($1) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(3) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(4) Five dollars ($5) to the commission fund.
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(5) Any remaining amount to the motor vehicle highway account.
SECTION 68. IC 9-24-3-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.111-2021,
SECTION 37, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this article,
the bureau shall issue a driver's license to an individual who meets the
following conditions:
(1) Satisfies the age requirements set forth in section 2.5 of this
chapter.
(2) Makes proper application to the bureau under IC 9-24-9 upon
a form prescribed by the bureau. The form must include an
attestation concerning the number of hours of supervised driving
practice that the individual has completed if the individual is
required under section 2.5 of this chapter to complete a certain
number of hours of supervised driving practice in order to receive
a driver's license. The:
(A) parent or guardian of an applicant less than eighteen (18)
years of age; or
(B) applicant, if the applicant is at least eighteen (18) years of
age;
shall attest in writing under penalty of perjury to the time logged
in practice driving.
(3) Satisfactorily passes the examination and tests required for
issuance of a driver's license under IC 9-24-10.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (e), pays the following
applicable fee:
(A) For an individual who is less than seventy-five (75) years
of age, seventeen dollars and fifty cents ($17.50).
(B) For an individual who is at least seventy-five (75) years of
age but less than eighty-five (85) years of age, eleven dollars
($11).
(C) For an individual who is at least eighty-five (85) years of
age, seven dollars ($7).
(b) A fee described in subsection (a)(4)(A) shall be distributed as
follows:
(1) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(2) Two dollars ($2) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(3) Four dollars and fifty cents ($4.50) to the motor vehicle
highway account.
(4) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(5) Nine dollars and twenty-five cents ($9.25) to the commission
fund.
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(c) A fee described in subsection (a)(4)(B) shall be distributed as
follows:
(1) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(2) One dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(3) Three dollars ($3) to the motor vehicle highway account.
(4) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(5) Four dollars and seventy-five cents ($4.75) to the commission
fund.
(d) A fee described in subsection (a)(4)(C) shall be distributed as
follows:
(1) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(2) One dollar ($1) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(3) Two dollars ($2) to the motor vehicle highway account.
(4) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(5) Two dollars and twenty-five cents ($2.25) to the commission
fund.
(e) A fee described in subsection (a)(4) may not be charged to an
individual who:
(1) is under the care and supervision of the department of child
services; or
(2) represents, pursuant to IC 31-36-3-4(b), a homeless youth (as
defined in IC 31-36-3-4) and presents a fee and consent waiver
affidavit described in IC 31-36-3-4(c);
and meets all other requirements for a driver's license under this article.
SECTION 69. IC 9-24-6.1-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.108-2019,
SECTION 187, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The fee for a commercial
driver's license issued before January 1, 2017, is thirty-six dollars
($36). The fee shall be distributed as follows:
(1) One dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) to the state motor vehicle
technology fund.
(2) Fifteen dollars ($15) to the motor vehicle highway account.
(3) Five dollars ($5) to the integrated public safety emergency
communications fund.
(4) Fourteen dollars and fifty cents ($14.50) to the commission
fund.
(b) The fee for a commercial driver's license issued after December
31, 2016, is thirty-five dollars ($35). The fee shall be distributed as
follows:
(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the state construction fund.
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(2) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(3) Two dollars ($2) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(4) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(5) Four dollars and seventy-five cents ($4.75) to the commission
fund.
(6) Any remaining amount to the motor vehicle highway account.
(c) The fee for a commercial learner's permit is seventeen dollars
($17). The fee shall be distributed as follows:
(1) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(2) Two dollars ($2) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(3) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(4) To the commission fund as follows:
(A) For a commercial learner's permit issued before January 1,
2017, twelve dollars and seventy-five cents ($12.75).
(B) For a commercial learner's permit issued after December
31, 2016, five dollars ($5).
(5) To the motor vehicle highway account as follows:
(A) For a commercial learner's permit issued before January 1,
2017, fifty cents ($0.50).
(B) For a commercial learner's permit issued after December
31, 2016, eight dollars and twenty-five cents ($8.25).
(d) The payment of a fee imposed under this section does not relieve
the holder of a commercial driver's license or commercial learner's
permit of responsibility for the following fees, as applicable:
(1) The fee to issue an amended or a replacement license or
permit under IC 9-24-14-1.
(2) A fee to add or remove an endorsement to a license or permit
under subsection (e) or IC 9-24-8.5-3.
(3) The administrative penalty for the delinquent renewal of a
license under IC 9-24-12-13.
(e) The fee to add or remove an endorsement, other than a
motorcycle endorsement, to a commercial driver's license or
commercial learner's permit is nineteen dollars ($19). The fee shall be
distributed as follows:
(1) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(2) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the motor vehicle
highway account.
(3) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(4) Sixteen dollars ($16) to the commission fund.
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


SECTION 70. IC 9-24-7-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.174-2023,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The bureau shall issue a learner's permit to
an individual who satisfies the following conditions:
(1) Makes a proper application in the form and manner prescribed
by the bureau.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (d), pays a fee under
subsection (b) or (c), as applicable.
(3) If less than eighteen (18) years of age:
(A) is not ineligible under IC 9-24-2-1; and
(B) provides the bureau with an emergency contact person (as
defined by IC 9-26-2-5) who is not the individual who holds
the learner's permit to be listed in the Indiana emergency
contact data base described in IC 9-26-10-1 for the individual
who holds the learner's permit.
(4) Has passed a written examination as required under
IC 9-24-10.
(5) Either:
(A) is at least sixteen (16) years of age; or
(B) if at least fifteen (15) years of age but less than sixteen
(16) years of age, is enrolled in an approved driver education
course.
(b) The fee for a learner's permit issued before January 1, 2017, is
nine dollars and fifty cents ($9.50). The fee shall be distributed as
follows:
(1) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the motor vehicle highway account.
(2) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(3) Two dollars ($2) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(4) One dollar and seventy-five cents ($1.75) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(5) Four dollars and seventy-five cents ($4.75) to the commission
fund.
(c) The fee for a learner's permit issued after December 31, 2016, is
nine dollars ($9). The fee shall be distributed as follows:
(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the motor vehicle highway
account.
(2) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(3) Two dollars ($2) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(4) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(5) Five dollars ($5) to the commission fund.
(d) A fee described in subsection (a) may not be charged to an
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


individual who:
(1) is under the care and supervision of the department of child
services; or
(2) represents, pursuant to IC 31-36-3-4(b), a homeless youth (as
defined in IC 31-36-3-4) and presents a fee and consent waiver
affidavit described in IC 31-36-3-4(c);
and meets all other requirements for a learner's permit under IC 9-24.
SECTION 71. IC 9-24-8-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.111-2021,
SECTION 49, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The bureau shall issue a motorcycle
learner's permit to an individual who meets the following conditions:
(1) The individual holds a valid driver's license issued under this
article.
(2) The individual passes a written examination developed by the
bureau concerning the safe operation of a motorcycle.
(3) The individual makes a proper application in the form and
manner prescribed by the bureau.
(4) The individual pays the appropriate fee under subsection (c)
or (d).
(b) A motorcycle learner's permit authorizes the holder to operate a
motorcycle upon a highway under the following conditions:
(1) The holder wears a helmet that meets the standards described
in 49 CFR 571.218 as in effect January 1, 2000.
(2) The motorcycle is operated only during the period from
one-half (1/2) hour before sunrise to one-half (1/2) hour after
sunset.
(3) The motorcycle does not carry passengers other than the
operator.
(c) The fee for a motorcycle learner's permit issued before January
1, 2017, is nine dollars and fifty cents ($9.50). The fee shall be
distributed as follows:
(1) One dollar ($1) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(2) One dollar ($1) to the motor vehicle highway account.
(3) Two dollars ($2) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(4) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(5) Four dollars and twenty-five cents ($4.25) to the commission
fund.
(d) The fee for a motorcycle learner's permit issued after December
31, 2016, is nine dollars ($9). The fee shall be distributed as follows:
(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the motor vehicle highway
account.
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(2) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(3) Two dollars ($2) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(4) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(5) Five dollars ($5) to the commission fund.
(e) The fee for a motorcycle operational skills test administered
under this chapter is as follows:
(1) For tests given by state employees, the fee is five dollars ($5)
and shall be deposited in the motor vehicle highway account
under IC 8-14-1.
(2) For tests given by a contractor approved by the bureau, the fee
is:
(A) determined under rules adopted by the bureau under
IC 4-22-2 to cover the direct costs of administering the test;
and
(B) paid to the contractor.
SECTION 72. IC 9-24-8.5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.211-2023,
SECTION 35, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The bureau shall add a motorcycle
endorsement to a driver's license if the holder meets the following
conditions:
(1) Is at least:
(A) sixteen (16) years and ninety (90) days of age and has
completed a motorcycle operator safety education course
approved by the bureau under IC 9-27-7; or
(B) sixteen (16) years and two hundred seventy (270) days of
age.
(2) Makes a proper application in the form and manner prescribed
by the bureau.
(3) Has passed a written examination developed by the bureau
concerning the safe operation of a motorcycle.
(4) Satisfactorily completes an operational skills test at a location
approved by the bureau.
(5) Pays a fee of nineteen dollars ($19). The fee shall be
distributed as follows:
(A) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(B) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the motor
vehicle highway account.
(C) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(D) Sixteen dollars ($16) to the commission fund.
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(b) The bureau may waive the testing requirements under subsection
(a)(3) and (a)(4) for an individual who satisfactorily completes a
motorcycle operator safety course approved by the bureau as set forth
in IC 9-27-7.
(c) The bureau may waive the operational skills test under
subsection (a)(4) for an individual who holds a valid motorcycle
endorsement or motorcycle license from any other jurisdiction.
(d) An individual who fails the operational skills test under
subsection (a)(4) three (3) consecutive times is not eligible to retake
the test until two (2) months after the date of the most recent failed test.
(e) The fee for a motorcycle operational skills test administered
under this chapter is as follows:
(1) For tests given by state employees, the fee is five dollars ($5)
and shall be deposited in the motor vehicle highway account
under IC 8-14-1.
(2) For tests given by a contractor approved by the bureau, the fee
is:
(A) determined under rules adopted by the bureau under
IC 4-22-2 to cover the direct costs of administering the test;
and
(B) paid to the contractor.
(f) The bureau may impose an additional fee of twenty-five dollars
($25) if the bureau processes an application for a physical credential
under this chapter in a period of time that is shorter than the normal
processing period. The bureau shall deposit the fee in the commission
fund.
(g) A fee imposed under this section is in addition to any other fee
imposed under this chapter.
SECTION 73. IC 9-24-8.5-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.211-2023,
SECTION 36, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The bureau shall add a for-hire endorsement
to a driver's license if the holder meets the following conditions:
(1) Is at least eighteen (18) years of age.
(2) Has held a valid driver's license for more than one (1) year.
(3) Makes a proper application in a form and manner prescribed
by the bureau.
(4) Satisfactorily passes a written test approved by the bureau.
(5) Pays a fee of nineteen dollars ($19). The fee shall be
distributed as follows:
(A) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(B) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the motor
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


vehicle highway account.
(C) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(D) Sixteen dollars ($16) to the commission fund.
(b) The bureau may impose an additional fee of twenty-five dollars
($25) if the bureau processes an application for a physical credential
under this chapter in a period of time that is shorter than the normal
processing period. The bureau shall deposit the fee in the commission
fund.
(c) A fee imposed under this section is in addition to any other fee
imposed under this chapter.
SECTION 74. IC 9-24-12-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.211-2023,
SECTION 46, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), and
subject to subsection (d), an individual applying for renewal of a
driver's license in the form of a physical credential (issued under
IC 9-24-3), or a chauffeur's or a public passenger chauffeur's license,
including any endorsements in effect with respect to the license, must
apply in person at a license branch and do the following:
(1) Pass an eyesight examination.
(2) Pass a written examination if:
(A) the applicant has at least six (6) active points on the
applicant's driving record maintained by the bureau;
(B) the applicant has not reached the applicant's twenty-first
birthday and has active points on the applicant's driving record
maintained by the bureau; or
(C) the applicant is in possession of a driver's license that is
expired beyond one hundred eighty (180) days.
(b) The holder of a driver's license in the form of a physical
credential (issued under IC 9-24-3), a chauffeur's or a public passenger
chauffeur's license, or a learner's permit issued in the form of a physical
credential under IC 9-24-7 may renew the license, including any
endorsements in effect with respect to the license, by mail or by
electronic service, subject to the following conditions:
(1) A valid computerized image of the individual must exist
within the records of the bureau.
(2) The previous renewal of the individual's driver's license
(issued under IC 9-24-3), chauffeur's or public passenger
chauffeur's license, or a learner's permit issued under IC 9-24-7
must not have been by mail or by electronic service.
(3) The application for or previous renewal of the individual's
license or permit must have included a test of the individual's
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


eyesight approved by the bureau.
(4) If the individual were applying for the license or permit
renewal in person at a license branch, the individual would not be
required under subsection (a)(2) to submit to a written
examination.
(5) The individual must be a citizen of the United States, as
shown in the records of the bureau.
(6) There must not have been any change in the:
(A) address; or
(B) name;
of the individual since the issuance or previous renewal of the
individual's driver's license (issued under IC 9-24-3), chauffeur's
or public passenger chauffeur's license, or a learner's permit
issued under IC 9-24-7.
(7) The driver's license (issued under IC 9-24-3), chauffeur's or
public passenger chauffeur's license, or a learner's permit issued
under IC 9-24-7 of the individual must not be:
(A) suspended; or
(B) expired more than one hundred eighty (180) days;
at the time of the application for renewal.
(8) If the individual is seventy-five (75) years of age or older at
the time of the application for renewal, the individual must
provide proof, on a form approved by the bureau, that the
individual has passed an eyesight examination within thirty (30)
days prior to the renewal application.
(c) An individual applying for the renewal of a driver's license
issued in the form of a physical credential (issued under IC 9-24-3), a
chauffeur's license or a public passenger chauffeur's license, or a
learner's permit issued in the form of a physical credential under
IC 9-24-7, including any endorsements in effect with respect to the
license, must apply in person at a license branch under subsection (a)
if the individual is not entitled to apply by mail or by electronic service
under subsection (b).
(d) The bureau may not issue or renew a chauffeur's or a public
passenger chauffeur's license after December 31, 2016. If a holder of
a chauffeur's or a public passenger chauffeur's license applies after
December 31, 2016, for renewal of the chauffeur's or public passenger
chauffeur's license, the bureau shall issue to the holder a driver's
license under IC 9-24-3 with a for-hire endorsement if the holder:
(1) applies in a form and manner prescribed by the bureau; and
(2) satisfies the requirements for renewal of a driver's license
issued under IC 9-24-3, including the fee and examination
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


requirements under this section.
(e) An individual applying for the renewal of a driver's license
issued in the form of a physical credential under IC 9-24-3 shall pay the
following applicable fee:
(1) If the individual is less than seventy-five (75) years of age,
seventeen dollars and fifty cents ($17.50). The fee shall be
distributed as follows:
(A) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(B) Two dollars ($2) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(C) Four dollars and fifty cents ($4.50) to the motor vehicle
highway account.
(D) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(E) Nine dollars and twenty-five cents ($9.25) to the
commission fund.
(2) If the individual is at least seventy-five (75) years of age and
less than eighty-five (85) years of age, eleven dollars ($11). The
fee shall be distributed as follows:
(A) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(B) One dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) to the crossroads 2000
fund.
(C) Three dollars ($3) to the motor vehicle highway account.
(D) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(E) Four dollars and seventy-five cents ($4.75) to the
commission fund.
(3) If the individual is at least eighty-five (85) years of age, seven
dollars ($7). The fee shall be distributed as follows:
(A) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(B) One dollar ($1) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(C) Two dollars ($2) to the motor vehicle highway account.
(D) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(E) Two dollars and twenty-five cents ($2.25) to the
commission fund.
A fee paid under this subsection after December 31, 2016, includes the
renewal of any endorsements that are in effect with respect to the
driver's license issued in the form of a physical credential under
IC 9-24-3 at the time of renewal.
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


SECTION 75. IC 9-24-14-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.211-2023,
SECTION 50, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. If a permit or driver's license issued in the form
of a physical credential under this article is lost or destroyed, and as
provided in section 3.5 of this chapter, the individual to whom the
permit or driver's license was issued may obtain a replacement if the
individual pays a fee as follows:
(1) For a replacement permit or driver's license, other than a
commercial driver's license, issued before January 1, 2017, ten
dollars and fifty cents ($10.50). The fee shall be distributed as
follows:
(A) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(B) One dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) to the crossroads 2000
fund.
(C) One dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) to the motor vehicle
highway account.
(D) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(E) Five dollars and seventy-five cents ($5.75) to the
commission fund.
(2) For a replacement commercial driver's license issued before
January 1, 2017, five dollars and fifty cents ($5.50). The fee shall
be distributed as follows:
(A) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(B) One dollar ($1) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(C) One dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) to the motor vehicle
highway account.
(D) Two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) to the commission
fund.
(3) For a replacement permit or driver's license issued after
December 31, 2016, nine dollars ($9). The fee shall be distributed
as follows:
(A) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the motor vehicle highway
account.
(B) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(C) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(D) Two dollars ($2) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(E) Five dollars ($5) to the commission fund.
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


SECTION 76. IC 9-24-16-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.111-2021,
SECTION 73, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) The bureau may:
(1) adopt rules under IC 4-22-2, including rules to:
(A) verify an applicant's identity, lawful status, and residence;
and
(B) invalidate on a temporary basis a license or permit that
was issued based on fraudulent documentation; and
(2) prescribe all forms necessary;
to implement this chapter.
(b) The bureau may not impose a fee for the issuance of:
(1) an original;
(2) a renewal of an;
(3) a replacement; or
(4) an amended;
identification card to an individual described in subsection (c). For
purposes of this subsection, the amendment of an identification card
includes the addition of a motor driven cycle endorsement to the
identification card.
(c) An identification card must be issued without the payment of a
fee or charge to an individual who does not have a valid Indiana
driver's license if the individual:
(1) will be at least eighteen (18) years of age and eligible to vote
in the next general, municipal, or special election;
(2) is:
(A) at least sixteen (16) years of age; and
(B) under the care and supervision of the department of child
services; or
(3) represents, pursuant to IC 31-36-3-4(b), a homeless youth (as
defined in IC 31-36-3-4) and presents a fee and consent waiver
affidavit described in IC 31-36-3-4(c).
(d) The fee to issue, renew, replace, or amend an identification card
issued before January 1, 2017, is as follows:
(1) To an individual who is less than sixty-five (65) years of age,
eleven dollars and fifty cents ($11.50). The fee shall be
distributed as follows:
(A) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(B) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(C) Two dollars and seventy-five cents ($2.75) to the motor
vehicle highway account.
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(D) Seven dollars ($7) to the commission fund.
(2) To an individual who is at least sixty-five (65) years of age or
to an individual with a physical disability who is not entitled to
obtain a driver's license, nine dollars ($9). The fee shall be
distributed as follows:
(A) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(B) One dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) to the motor vehicle
highway account.
(C) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(D) Five dollars and seventy-five cents ($5.75) to the
commission fund.
(e) The fee to issue, renew, replace, or amend an identification card
issued after December 31, 2016, is nine dollars ($9). The fee shall be
distributed as follows:
(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the motor vehicle highway
account.
(2) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(3) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(4) Two dollars ($2) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(5) Five dollars ($5) to the commission fund.
SECTION 77. IC 9-24-16.5-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.256-2017,
SECTION 180, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) The fee to issue, renew,
replace, or amend a photo exempt identification card issued before
January 1, 2017, is as follows:
(1) To an individual who is less than sixty-five (65) years of age,
eleven dollars and fifty cents ($11.50). The fee shall be
distributed as follows:
(A) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(B) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(C) Two dollars and seventy-five cents ($2.75) to the motor
vehicle highway account.
(D) Seven dollars ($7) to the commission fund.
(2) To an individual who is at least sixty-five (65) years of age or
to an individual with a physical disability who is not entitled to
obtain a driver's license, nine dollars ($9). The fee shall be
distributed as follows:
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(A) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(B) One dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) to the motor vehicle
highway account.
(C) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(D) Five dollars and seventy-five cents ($5.75) to the
commission fund.
(b) The fee to issue, renew, replace, or amend a photo exempt
identification card issued after December 31, 2016, is nine dollars ($9).
The fee shall be distributed as follows:
(1) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) to the motor vehicle highway
account.
(2) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology fund.
(3) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety emergency communications fund.
(4) Two dollars ($2) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(5) Five dollars ($5) to the commission fund.
SECTION 78. IC 11-8-8-4.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.218-2025,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4.5. (a) Except as provided in section 22 of
this chapter, as used in this chapter, "sex offender" means a person
convicted of any of the following offenses:
(1) Rape (IC 35-42-4-1).
(2) Criminal deviate conduct (IC 35-42-4-2) (before its repeal).
(3) Child molesting (IC 35-42-4-3).
(4) Child exploitation (IC 35-42-4-4(b) or IC 35-42-4-4(c)).
(5) Vicarious sexual gratification (including performing sexual
conduct in the presence of a minor) (IC 35-42-4-5).
(6) Child solicitation (IC 35-42-4-6).
(7) Child seduction (IC 35-42-4-7).
(8) Sexual misconduct with a minor (IC 35-42-4-9) as a Class A,
Class B, or Class C felony (for a crime committed before July 1,
2014) or a Level 1, Level 2, Level 4, or Level 5 felony (for a
crime committed after June 30, 2014), unless:
(A) the person is convicted of sexual misconduct with a minor
as a Class C felony (for a crime committed before July 1,
2014) or a Level 5 felony (for a crime committed after June
30, 2014);
(B) the person is not more than:
(i) four (4) years older than the victim if the offense was
committed after June 30, 2007; or
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(ii) five (5) years older than the victim if the offense was
committed before July 1, 2007; and
(C) the sentencing court finds that the person should not be
required to register as a sex offender.
(9) Incest (IC 35-46-1-3).
(10) Sexual battery (IC 35-42-4-8).
(11) Kidnapping (IC 35-42-3-2), if the victim is less than eighteen
(18) years of age, and the person who kidnapped the victim is not
the victim's parent or guardian.
(12) Criminal confinement (IC 35-42-3-3), if the victim is less
than eighteen (18) years of age, and the person who confined or
removed the victim is not the victim's parent or guardian.
(13) Possession of child sex abuse material (IC 35-42-4-4(d) or
IC 35-42-4-4(e)).
(14) Promoting prostitution (IC 35-45-4-4) as a Class B felony
(for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 4 felony
(for a crime committed after June 30, 2014).
(15) Promotion of human sexual trafficking under
IC 35-42-3.5-1.1.
(16) Promotion of child sexual trafficking under
IC 35-42-3.5-1.2(a).
(17) Promotion of sexual trafficking of a younger child
(IC 35-42-3.5-1.2(c)).
(18) Child sexual trafficking (IC 35-42-3.5-1.3).
(19) Human trafficking under IC 35-42-3.5-1.4 if the victim is
less than eighteen (18) years of age.
(20) Sexual misconduct by a service provider with a detained or
supervised child (IC 35-44.1-3-10(c)).
(b) The term includes:
(1) a person who is required to register as a sex offender in any
state or jurisdiction; and
(2) a person who has been designated:
(A) a sex offender;
(B) a sexually violent predator; or
(C) a sex offender designation in another state or
jurisdiction and who was or would be subjected to the sex
offender registration reporting requirements in the other
state or jurisdiction if the person:
(i) resided;
(ii) worked;
(iii) volunteered;
(iv) attended school; or
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(v) owned real property;
in that state or jurisdiction;
(3) a person who has been convicted of failure to register as a
sex offender in any state or jurisdiction;
(4) a person who is required to register under 34 U.S.C. 20901
et seq., the federal Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety
Act of 2006; and
(2) (5) a child who has committed a delinquent act, or a person
prosecuted under IC 31-30-1-4(d) for an offense described in
subsection (a) committed when the person was less than eighteen
(18) years of age, but who was at least twenty-one (21) years of
age when the charge was filed, and who:
(A) is at least fourteen (14) years of age;
(B) is on probation, is on parole, is discharged from a facility
by the department of correction, is discharged from a secure
private facility (as defined in IC 31-9-2-115), or is discharged
from a juvenile detention facility as a result of an adjudication
as a delinquent child for an act that would be an offense
described in subsection (a) if committed by an adult; and
(C) is found by a court by clear and convincing evidence to be
likely to repeat an act that would be an offense described in
subsection (a) if committed by an adult.
(c) The department shall consider:
(1) all states and jurisdictions in which the person has resided,
worked, volunteered, attended school, or owned real
property; and
(2) evidence submitted under subsections (d) and (e).
(d) A person may submit information to the department
regarding why the person's sex offender registration status in
another state or jurisdiction should not apply to them if the person
resided, worked, volunteered, or attended school for a period less
than thirty (30) days in a one (1) year period in another state or
jurisdiction.
(e) A person may submit the following information for the
department to consider regarding a person described under
subsection (b)(2):
(1) Information regarding the person's length of stay in the
other state or jurisdiction.
(2) Information regarding school enrollment.
(3) Information regarding work status.
(4) Information regarding property rental.
(5) Information regarding utility start and end dates.
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(6) The mailing address used in the other state or jurisdiction.
(7) Mailing address change information.
(8) Other information for the department to consider in
making a determination regarding sex offender registration
status in the other state or jurisdiction.
(f) The department shall consider the submitted evidence under
subsections (d) and (e), if the evidence is clear and convincing. The
department shall make a determination whether the designation
should apply to the person within thirty (30) days of the evidence
being submitted and provide a written response to the person.
(c) (g) In making a determination under subsection (b)(2)(C),
(b)(5)(C), the court shall consider expert testimony concerning whether
a child is likely to repeat an act that would be an offense described in
subsection (a) if committed by an adult.
(d) (h) A person child ordered to register under subsection (b)(2)
(b)(5) may petition the court to reconsider the order at any time after
completing court ordered sex offender treatment. The court shall
consider expert testimony concerning whether a child or person is
likely to repeat an offense described in subsection (a) or an act that
would be an offense described in subsection (a) if committed by an
adult.
SECTION 79. IC 11-8-8-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.218-2025,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5. (a) Except as provided in section 22 of this
chapter, as used in this chapter, "sex or violent offender" means a
person convicted of any of the following offenses:
(1) Rape (IC 35-42-4-1).
(2) Criminal deviate conduct (IC 35-42-4-2) (before its repeal).
(3) Child molesting (IC 35-42-4-3).
(4) Child exploitation (IC 35-42-4-4(b) or IC 35-42-4-4(c)).
(5) Vicarious sexual gratification (including performing sexual
conduct in the presence of a minor) (IC 35-42-4-5).
(6) Child solicitation (IC 35-42-4-6).
(7) Child seduction (IC 35-42-4-7).
(8) Sexual misconduct with a minor (IC 35-42-4-9) as a Class A,
Class B, or Class C felony (for a crime committed before July 1,
2014) or a Level 1, Level 2, Level 4, or Level 5 felony (for a
crime committed after June 30, 2014), unless:
(A) the person is convicted of sexual misconduct with a minor
as a Class C felony (for a crime committed before July 1,
2014) or a Level 5 felony (for a crime committed after June
30, 2014);
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(B) the person is not more than:
(i) four (4) years older than the victim if the offense was
committed after June 30, 2007; or
(ii) five (5) years older than the victim if the offense was
committed before July 1, 2007; and
(C) the sentencing court finds that the person should not be
required to register as a sex offender.
(9) Incest (IC 35-46-1-3).
(10) Sexual battery (IC 35-42-4-8).
(11) Kidnapping (IC 35-42-3-2), if the victim is less than eighteen
(18) years of age, and the person who kidnapped the victim is not
the victim's parent or guardian.
(12) Criminal confinement (IC 35-42-3-3), if the victim is less
than eighteen (18) years of age, and the person who confined or
removed the victim is not the victim's parent or guardian.
(13) Possession of child sex abuse material (IC 35-42-4-4(d) or
IC 35-42-4-4(e)).
(14) Promoting prostitution (IC 35-45-4-4) as a Class B felony
(for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 4 felony
(for a crime committed after June 30, 2014).
(15) Promotion of human sexual trafficking under
IC 35-42-3.5-1.1.
(16) Promotion of child sexual trafficking under
IC 35-42-3.5-1.2(a).
(17) Promotion of sexual trafficking of a younger child
(IC 35-42-3.5-1.2(c)).
(18) Child sexual trafficking (IC 35-42-3.5-1.3).
(19) Human trafficking under IC 35-42-3.5-1.4 if the victim is
less than eighteen (18) years of age.
(20) Murder (IC 35-42-1-1).
(21) Voluntary manslaughter (IC 35-42-1-3).
(22) Sexual misconduct by a service provider with a detained or
supervised child (IC 35-44.1-3-10(c)).
(b) The term includes:
(1) a person who is required to register as a sex or violent
offender in any jurisdiction; and
(2) a person who has been designated:
(A) a sex or violent offender;
(B) a sexually violent predator; or
(C) a sex or violent offender designation in another state or
jurisdiction and who was or would be subjected to the sex
offender registration reporting requirements in the other
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


state or jurisdiction if the person:
(i) resided;
(ii) worked;
(iii) volunteered;
(iv) attended school; or
(v) owned real property;
in that state or jurisdiction;
(3) a person who has been convicted of failure to register as a
sex or violent offender in any state or jurisdiction;
(4) a person who is required to register under 34 U.S.C. 20901
et seq., the federal Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety
Act of 2006; and
(2) (5) a child who has committed a delinquent act, or a person
prosecuted under IC 31-30-1-4(d) for an offense described in
subsection (a) committed when the person was less than eighteen
(18) years of age, but who was at least twenty-one (21) years of
age when the charge was filed, and who:
(A) is at least fourteen (14) years of age;
(B) is on probation, is on parole, is discharged from a facility
by the department of correction, is discharged from a secure
private facility (as defined in IC 31-9-2-115), or is discharged
from a juvenile detention facility as a result of an adjudication
as a delinquent child for an act that would be an offense
described in subsection (a) if committed by an adult; and
(C) is found by a court by clear and convincing evidence to be
likely to repeat an act that would be an offense described in
subsection (a) if committed by an adult.
(c) The department shall consider:
(1) all states and jurisdictions in which the person has resided,
worked, volunteered, attended school, or owned real
property; and
(2) evidence submitted under subsections (d) and (e).
(d) A person may submit information to the department
regarding why the person's sex or violent offender registration
status in another state or jurisdiction should not apply to them if
the person resided, worked, volunteered, or attended school for a
period less than thirty (30) days in a one (1) year period in another
state or jurisdiction.
(e) A person may submit the following information for the
department to consider regarding a person described under
subsection (b)(2):
(1) Information regarding the person's length of stay in the
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


other state or jurisdiction.
(2) Information regarding school enrollment.
(3) Information regarding work status.
(4) Information regarding property rental.
(5) Information regarding utility start and end dates.
(6) The mailing address used in the other state or jurisdiction.
(7) Mailing address change information.
(8) Other information for the department to consider in
making a determination regarding sex or violent offender
registration status in the other state or jurisdiction.
(f) The department shall consider the submitted evidence under
subsections (d) and (e), if the evidence is clear and convincing. The
department shall make a determination whether the designation
should apply to the person within thirty (30) days of the evidence
being submitted and provide a written response to the person.
(c) (g) In making a determination under subsection (b)(2)(C),
(b)(5)(C), the court shall consider expert testimony concerning whether
a child is likely to repeat an act that would be an offense described in
subsection (a) if committed by an adult.
(d) (h) A person child ordered to register under subsection (b)(2)
(b)(5) may petition the court to reconsider the order at any time after
completing court ordered sex offender treatment. The court shall
consider expert testimony concerning whether a child or person is
likely to repeat an offense described in subsection (a) or an act that
would be an offense described in subsection (a) if committed by an
adult.
SECTION 80. IC 11-8-8-19, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 158, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 19. (a) Except as provided in
subsections (b) through (f), a sex or violent offender is required to
register under this chapter until the expiration of ten (10) years after the
date the sex or violent offender:
(1) is released from a penal facility (as defined in
IC 35-31.5-2-232) or a secure juvenile detention facility of a state
or another jurisdiction;
(2) is placed in a community transition program;
(3) is placed in a community corrections program;
(4) is placed on parole; or
(5) is placed on probation;
for the sex or violent offense requiring registration, whichever occurs
last. The registration period is tolled during any period that the sex or
violent offender is incarcerated. The registration period does not restart
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


if the offender is convicted of a subsequent offense. However, if the
subsequent offense is a sex or violent offense, or an offense under
section 17 of this chapter, a new registration period may be imposed in
accordance with this chapter. The department shall ensure that an
offender who is no longer required to register as a sex or violent
offender is notified that the obligation to register has expired, and shall
ensure that the offender's information is no longer published to the
public portal of the sex and violent offender registry website
established under IC 36-2-13-5.5.
(b) A sex or violent offender who is a sexually violent predator is
required to register for life.
(c) A sex or violent offender who is convicted of at least one (1)
offense under section 5(a) of this chapter that the sex or violent
offender committed:
(1) when the person was at least eighteen (18) years of age; and
(2) against a victim who was less than twelve (12) years of age at
the time of the crime;
is required to register for life.
(d) A sex or violent offender who is convicted of at least one (1)
offense under section 5(a) of this chapter in which the sex offender:
(1) proximately caused serious bodily injury or death to the
victim;
(2) used force or the threat of force against the victim or a
member of the victim's family, unless the offense is sexual battery
as a Class D felony (for an offense committed before July 1,
2014) or a Level 6 felony (for a crime committed after June 30,
2014); or
(3) rendered the victim unconscious or otherwise incapable of
giving voluntary consent;
is required to register for life.
(e) A sex or violent offender who is convicted of at least two (2)
unrelated offenses under section 5(a) of this chapter is required to
register for life.
(f) A person who is required to register as a sex or violent offender
in any jurisdiction a:
(1) sex offender under section 4.5 of this chapter; or
(2) sex or violent offender under section 5 of this chapter;
shall register for the period required by the other another jurisdiction
or the period described in this section, whichever is longer.
SECTION 81. IC 11-12-5-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) This section does
not apply to a person confined to a county jail who:
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(1) maintains a policy of insurance from a private company
covering:
(A) medical care;
(B) dental care;
(C) eye care; or
(D) any other health care related service; or
(2) is willing to pay for the person's own medical care.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), a person confined to a
county jail may be required to make a copayment in an amount of not
more than fifteen dollars ($15) thirty dollars ($30) for each provision
of any of the following services:
(1) Medical care.
(2) Dental care.
(3) Eye care.
(4) Any other health care related service.
(c) A person confined to a county jail is not required to make the
copayment under subsection (b) if:
(1) the person does not have funds in the person's commissary
account or trust account at the time the service is provided;
(2) the person does not have funds in the person's commissary
account or trust account within sixty (60) days one hundred
eighty (180) days after the service is provided;
(3) the service is provided in an emergency;
(4) the service is provided as a result of an injury received in the
county jail; or
(5) the service is provided at the request of the sheriff or jail
administrator.
(d) Money collected must be deposited into the county medical care
for inmates fund.
(e) Rules for the implementation of this section must be approved
by the county legislative body.
SECTION 82. IC 31-37-19-11.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11.8. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (b), if:
(1) the department of correction releases a child who is a
ward of the department of correction from custody; and
(2) the child is less than eighteen (18) years of age;
the department of correction's wardship of the child ends.
(b) If:
(1) the department of correction releases a child described in
subsection (a); and
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(2) no parent or guardian of the child allows the child to live
with them after the child's release;
the department of correction must immediately inform the court
that awarded wardship of the child to the department of correction
that the child needs to be made a ward of the department of child
services.
SECTION 83. IC 34-13-3-12 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) Except as
provided in subsection (b), the notices required by sections 6, 8, 9,
and 11 of this chapter must be in writing and must be delivered in
person or by registered or certified mail.
(b) If a notice required by section 6 of this chapter is being sent
from an offender within the jurisdiction of the department of
correction, the department of correction is not required to send the
notice by registered or certified mail.
SECTION 84. IC 35-31.5-2-164.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 164.4. "Imitation firearm", for
purposes of IC 35-47-9-2, means an object or device that is
substantially similar in coloration and overall appearance to a
firearm that a reasonable person would believe the object or device
is a firearm.
SECTION 85. IC 35-38-1-7.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 229, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 7.5. (a) As used in this section,
"sexually violent predator" means a person who suffers from a mental
abnormality or personality disorder that makes the individual likely to
repeatedly commit a sex offense (as defined in IC 11-8-8-5.2). The
term includes a person convicted in another jurisdiction who is
identified as a sexually violent predator under IC 11-8-8-20. The term
does not include a person no longer considered a sexually violent
predator under subsection (g).
(b) A person who:
(1) being at least eighteen (18) years of age, commits an offense
described in:
(A) IC 35-42-4-1;
(B) IC 35-42-4-2 (before its repeal);
(C) IC 35-42-4-3 as a Class A or Class B felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 1, Level 2, Level 3,
or Level 4 felony (for a crime committed after June 30, 2014);
(D) IC 35-42-4-5(a)(1);
(E) IC 35-42-4-5(a)(2);
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(F) IC 35-42-4-5(a)(3) (before that provision was redesignated
by P.L.158-2013, SECTION 441);
(G) IC 35-42-4-5(b)(1) as a Class A or Class B felony (for a
crime committed before July 1, 2014) or Level 2, Level 3, or
Level 4 felony (for a crime committed after June 30, 2014);
(H) IC 35-42-4-5(b)(2); or
(I) IC 35-42-4-5(b)(3) as a Class A or Class B felony (for a
crime committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 2, Level 3, or
Level 4 felony (for a crime committed after June 30, 2014);
(2) commits a sex offense (as defined in IC 11-8-8-5.2) while
having a previous unrelated conviction for a sex offense for which
the person is required to register as a sex or violent offender under
IC 11-8-8;
(3) commits a sex offense (as defined in IC 11-8-8-5.2) while
having had a previous unrelated adjudication as a delinquent child
for an act that would be a sex offense if committed by an adult, if,
after considering expert testimony, a court finds by clear and
convincing evidence that the person is likely to commit an
additional sex offense; or
(4) commits a sex offense (as defined in IC 11-8-8-5.2) while
having had a previous unrelated adjudication as a delinquent child
for an act that would be a sex offense if committed by an adult, if
the person was required to register as a sex or violent offender
under IC 11-8-8-5(b)(2); IC 11-8-8-5(b)(5);
is a sexually violent predator. Except as provided in subsection (g) or
(h), a person is a sexually violent predator by operation of law if an
offense committed by the person satisfies the conditions set forth in
subdivision (1) or (2) and the person was released from incarceration,
secure detention, probation, or parole for the offense after June 30,
1994.
(c) This section applies whenever a court sentences a person or a
juvenile court issues a dispositional decree for a sex offense (as defined
in IC 11-8-8-5.2) for which the person is required to register with the
local law enforcement authority under IC 11-8-8.
(d) At the sentencing hearing, the court shall indicate on the record
whether the person has been convicted of an offense that makes the
person a sexually violent predator under subsection (b).
(e) If a person is not a sexually violent predator under subsection
(b), the prosecuting attorney may request the court to conduct a hearing
to determine whether the person (including a child adjudicated to be a
delinquent child) is a sexually violent predator under subsection (a). If
the court grants the motion, the court shall appoint two (2)
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


psychologists or psychiatrists who have expertise in criminal
behavioral disorders to evaluate the person and testify at the hearing.
After conducting the hearing and considering the testimony of the two
(2) psychologists or psychiatrists, the court shall determine whether the
person is a sexually violent predator under subsection (a). A hearing
conducted under this subsection may be combined with the person's
sentencing hearing.
(f) If a person is a sexually violent predator:
(1) the person is required to register with the local law
enforcement authority as provided in IC 11-8-8; and
(2) the court shall send notice to the department of correction.
(g) This subsection does not apply to a person who has two (2) or
more unrelated convictions for an offense described in IC 11-8-8-4.5
for which the person is required to register under IC 11-8-8. A person
who is a sexually violent predator may petition the court to consider
whether the person should no longer be considered a sexually violent
predator. The person may file a petition under this subsection not
earlier than ten (10) years after:
(1) the sentencing court or juvenile court makes its determination
under subsection (e); or
(2) the person is released from incarceration or secure detention.
A person may file a petition under this subsection not more than one
(1) time per year. A court may dismiss a petition filed under this
subsection or conduct a hearing to determine if the person should no
longer be considered a sexually violent predator. If the court conducts
a hearing, the court shall appoint two (2) psychologists or psychiatrists
who have expertise in criminal behavioral disorders to evaluate the
person and testify at the hearing. After conducting the hearing and
considering the testimony of the two (2) psychologists or psychiatrists,
the court shall determine whether the person should no longer be
considered a sexually violent predator under subsection (a). If a court
finds that the person should no longer be considered a sexually violent
predator, the court shall send notice to the department of correction that
the person is no longer considered a sexually violent predator or an
offender against children. Notwithstanding any other law, a condition
imposed on a person due to the person's status as a sexually violent
predator, including lifetime parole or GPS monitoring, does not apply
to a person no longer considered a sexually violent predator.
(h) A person is not a sexually violent predator by operation of law
under subsection (b)(1) if all of the following conditions are met:
(1) The victim was not less than twelve (12) years of age at the
time the offense was committed.
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(2) The person is not more than four (4) years older than the
victim.
(3) The relationship between the person and the victim was a
dating relationship or an ongoing personal relationship. The term
"ongoing personal relationship" does not include a family
relationship.
(4) The offense committed by the person was not any of the
following:
(A) Rape (IC 35-42-4-1).
(B) Criminal deviate conduct (IC 35-42-4-2) (before its
repeal).
(C) An offense committed by using or threatening the use of
deadly force or while armed with a deadly weapon.
(D) An offense that results in serious bodily injury.
(E) An offense that is facilitated by furnishing the victim,
without the victim's knowledge, with a drug (as defined in
IC 16-42-19-2(1)) or a controlled substance (as defined in
IC 35-48-1.1-7) or knowing that the victim was furnished with
the drug or controlled substance without the victim's
knowledge.
(5) The person has not committed another sex offense (as defined
in IC 11-8-8-5.2) (including a delinquent act that would be a sex
offense if committed by an adult) against any other person.
(6) The person did not have a position of authority or substantial
influence over the victim.
(7) The court finds that the person should not be considered a
sexually violent predator.
SECTION 86. IC 35-47-9-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.218-2023,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) This chapter does not apply to the following:
(1) A:
(A) federal;
(B) state; or
(C) local;
law enforcement officer.
(2) A:
(A) qualified law enforcement officer (as defined in 18 U.S.C.
926B); or
(B) qualified retired law enforcement officer (as defined in 18
U.S.C. 926C);
if the qualified law enforcement officer or qualified retired law
enforcement officer, as applicable, carries the photographic
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


identification required by 18 U.S.C. 926B or 18 U.S.C. 926C.
(3) A person who may legally possess a firearm and who has been
authorized by:
(A) a school board (as defined by IC 20-26-9-4); or
(B) the body that administers a charter school established
under IC 20-24;
to carry a firearm in or on school property.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (b) or (c), a person who:
(A) may legally possess a firearm; and
(B) possesses the firearm in a motor vehicle.
(5) A person who is a school resource officer, as defined in
IC 20-26-18.2-1.
(6) Except as provided in subsection (b) or (c), a person who:
(A) may legally possess a firearm; and
(B) possesses only a firearm that is:
(i) locked in the trunk of the person's motor vehicle;
(ii) kept in the glove compartment of the person's locked
motor vehicle; or
(iii) stored out of plain sight in the person's locked motor
vehicle.
(7) A person who:
(A) may legally possess a firearm; and
(B) possesses a firearm on school property in connection with
or while:
(i) attending a worship service or religious ceremony
conducted at a house of worship located on the school
property; or
(ii) carrying out the person's official duties at a house of
worship located on the school property, if the person is
employed by or a volunteer at the house of worship.
This subdivision does not affect the right of a property owner to
prohibit, in whole or in part, the possession of a firearm on a
property where a school or house of worship is located.
(b) For purposes of subsection (a)(4) and (a)(6), a person does not
include a person who is:
(1) enrolled as a student in any high school except if the person is
a high school student and is a member of a shooting sports team
and the school's principal has approved the person keeping a
firearm concealed in the person's motor vehicle on the days the
person is competing or practicing as a member of a shooting
sports team; or
(2) a former student of the school if the person is no longer
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


enrolled in the school due to a disciplinary action within the
previous twenty-four (24) months.
(c) For purposes of:
(1) subsection (a)(4); and
(2) subsection (a)(6); and
(3) section 2(b) of this chapter;
a motor vehicle does not include a motor vehicle owned, leased, or
controlled by a school or school district unless the person who
possesses the firearm is authorized by the school or school district to
possess a firearm.
SECTION 87. IC 35-47-9-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.109-2015,
SECTION 54, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) A person may not be charged with an
offense under this subsection if the person may be charged with an
offense described in subsection (c). (d). A person who knowingly or
intentionally possesses a firearm:
(1) in or on school property; or
(2) on a school bus;
commits a Level 6 felony.
(b) A person who knowingly or intentionally possesses an
imitation firearm:
(1) in or on school property; or
(2) on a school bus;
commits possession of an imitation firearm on a school property,
a Class B misdemeanor.
(b) (c) It is a defense to a prosecution under subsection subsections
(a) and (b) that:
(1) the person is permitted to legally possess the firearm or
imitation firearm; and
(2) the firearm or imitation firearm is:
(A) locked in the trunk of the person's motor vehicle;
(B) kept in the glove compartment of the person's locked
motor vehicle; or
(C) stored out of plain sight in the person's locked motor
vehicle.
(c) (d) A person who is permitted to legally possess a firearm and
who knowingly, intentionally, or recklessly leaves the firearm in plain
view in a motor vehicle that is parked in a school parking lot commits
a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 88. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) On July 1, 2026:
(1) all powers, duties, assets, and liabilities of the integrated
public safety commission;
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(2) any rules adopted by the integrated public safety
commission; and
(3) any appropriations to the integrated public safety
commission;
are transferred to the Indiana department of emergency
communications established by IC 5-26-2-1, as amended by this
act.
(b) On July 1, 2026, the Indiana department of emergency
communications shall assume all contractual obligations entered
into by the integrated public safety commission.
(c) After June 30, 2026, a reference to the integrated public
safety commission in any statute, rule, or other document shall be
treated as a reference to the Indiana department of emergency
communications.
(d) This SECTION expires July 1, 2029.
SECTION 89. An emergency is declared for this act.
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Veterans Affairs and Public
Safety, to which was referred House Bill 1363, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the House with
the recommendation that said bill be amended as follows:
Replace the effective dates in SECTIONS 77 through 78 with
"[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]".
Replace the effective date in SECTION 82 with "[EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]".
Page 1, delete lines 1 through 17, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 1. IC 5-2-1-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.100-2012,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) There is hereby created the position of
executive director of the law enforcement training board.
(b) The executive director shall be selected by the board. The
executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the board. and the
executive director's tenure of office shall be protected by a four (4)
year, renewable contract of employment which may be terminated
earlier by the board only for inefficiency, incompetence, neglect of
duty, or other good cause after having been accorded a hearing by the
board upon reasonable notice of the charge being made against the
executive director. A vote of at least eleven (11) members of the board
shall be necessary for the early termination of said contract of
employment. The executive director shall be selected on the basis of
education, training, and experience, and shall have at least ten (10)
years experience as an active law enforcement officer, at least five (5)
years of which shall have been in an executive or administrative
capacity.
(c) The executive director shall:
(1) perform such duties as may be assigned by the board; and
(2) shall be the chief administrative officer of the law
enforcement academy.
(d) The salary and compensation for the executive director, the
training staff, and employees shall be fixed by the board with the
approval of the governor.
(e) The executive director shall establish a table of organization to
be supplemented with job descriptions for each position subordinate to
that of the executive director, all of which shall be subject to the
approval of the board.
(f) All persons individuals hired to fill such approved vacancies
shall be selected on the basis of qualifications and merit based on
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


training, education, and experience.
(g) Employees and members of the training staff shall not be subject
to discharge, demotion, or suspension because of political affiliation,
but may be discharged, demoted, or suspended only for cause after
charges preferred in writing by the executive director.
(h) Any person so discharged or disciplined employee shall have a
right to a hearing before the board if such person the employee
requests a hearing by giving notice to the executive director within
fifteen (15) days after receiving written notice of discharge or
disciplinary action.
(i) Procedures under this section shall be consistent with
IC 4-21.5.".
Page 2, delete lines 1 through 28.
Page 10, between lines 29 and 30, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 28. IC 5-26-3-8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) The department shall issue a request for
proposals (RFP) (as defined in IC 5-22-2-28) for the purchase, or
before issuing a change order, of any communications systems and
equipment by the department that may be made available to public
safety agencies. The communications equipment must be
compatible with existing communications equipment used by
public safety agencies.
(b) Notwithstanding IC 5-22-9-10, proposals shall be evaluated
and awarded on a competitive basis using a scoring rubric
established by the department. The rubric must include specific
criteria developed by the department to ensure a transparent
selection process.
(c) Notwithstanding IC 5-22-9-7, all proposed contracts must be
approved by the budget agency before the department may enter
into a contract under this section.
(d) The department may provide reasonable notice to, and
coordinate procurement with, public safety agencies as
circumstances allow.".
Page 51, line 20, after "offender" insert "registration".
Page 52, line 12, after "offender" insert "registration".
Page 52, line 17, delete "in providing information to the court".
Page 52, line 28, after "offender" insert "registration".
Page 54, line 22, after "sex" insert "or violent".
Page 54, line 24, after "offender" insert "registration".
Page 54, line 33, after "sex" insert "or violent".
Page 55, line 16, after "sex" insert "or violent".
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


Page 55, line 16, after "offender" insert "registration".
Page 55, line 21, delete "in providing information to the court".
Page 55, line 32, after "offender" insert "registration".
Page 56, between lines 7 and 8, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 80. IC 11-8-8-19, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 158, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 19. (a) Except as provided in
subsections (b) through (f), a sex or violent offender is required to
register under this chapter until the expiration of ten (10) years after the
date the sex or violent offender:
(1) is released from a penal facility (as defined in
IC 35-31.5-2-232) or a secure juvenile detention facility of a state
or another jurisdiction;
(2) is placed in a community transition program;
(3) is placed in a community corrections program;
(4) is placed on parole; or
(5) is placed on probation;
for the sex or violent offense requiring registration, whichever occurs
last. The registration period is tolled during any period that the sex or
violent offender is incarcerated. The registration period does not restart
if the offender is convicted of a subsequent offense. However, if the
subsequent offense is a sex or violent offense, or an offense under
section 17 of this chapter, a new registration period may be imposed in
accordance with this chapter. The department shall ensure that an
offender who is no longer required to register as a sex or violent
offender is notified that the obligation to register has expired, and shall
ensure that the offender's information is no longer published to the
public portal of the sex and violent offender registry website
established under IC 36-2-13-5.5.
(b) A sex or violent offender who is a sexually violent predator is
required to register for life.
(c) A sex or violent offender who is convicted of at least one (1)
offense under section 5(a) of this chapter that the sex or violent
offender committed:
(1) when the person was at least eighteen (18) years of age; and
(2) against a victim who was less than twelve (12) years of age at
the time of the crime;
is required to register for life.
(d) A sex or violent offender who is convicted of at least one (1)
offense under section 5(a) of this chapter in which the sex offender:
(1) proximately caused serious bodily injury or death to the
victim;
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(2) used force or the threat of force against the victim or a
member of the victim's family, unless the offense is sexual battery
as a Class D felony (for an offense committed before July 1,
2014) or a Level 6 felony (for a crime committed after June 30,
2014); or
(3) rendered the victim unconscious or otherwise incapable of
giving voluntary consent;
is required to register for life.
(e) A sex or violent offender who is convicted of at least two (2)
unrelated offenses under section 5(a) of this chapter is required to
register for life.
(f) A person who is required to register as a sex or violent offender
in any jurisdiction a:
(1) sex offender under section 4.5 of this chapter; or
(2) sex or violent offender under section 5 of this chapter;
shall register for the period required by the other another jurisdiction
or the period described in this section, whichever is longer.
SECTION 81. IC 11-12-5-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) This section does
not apply to a person confined to a county jail who:
(1) maintains a policy of insurance from a private company
covering:
(A) medical care;
(B) dental care;
(C) eye care; or
(D) any other health care related service; or
(2) is willing to pay for the person's own medical care.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), a person confined to a
county jail may be required to make a copayment in an amount of not
more than fifteen dollars ($15) thirty dollars ($30) for each provision
of any of the following services:
(1) Medical care.
(2) Dental care.
(3) Eye care.
(4) Any other health care related service.
(c) A person confined to a county jail is not required to make the
copayment under subsection (b) if:
(1) the person does not have funds in the person's commissary
account or trust account at the time the service is provided;
(2) the person does not have funds in the person's commissary
account or trust account within sixty (60) days one hundred
eighty (180) days after the service is provided;
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107


(3) the service is provided in an emergency;
(4) the service is provided as a result of an injury received in the
county jail; or
(5) the service is provided at the request of the sheriff or jail
administrator.
(d) Money collected must be deposited into the county medical care
for inmates fund.
(e) Rules for the implementation of this section must be approved
by the county legislative body.".
Page 62, after line 33, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 87. An emergency is declared for this act.".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1363 as introduced.)
BARTELS
Committee Vote: yeas 11, nays 0.
HB 1363—LS 7087/DI 107